Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
Number of Reviews
39

Author
Jamey Hughton
If you've seen the trailer for The Haunting, then you've basically seen
the movie. This remake of the 1963 Robert Wise classic is simply a
showcase for horrific special effects, ghostly apparitions and floating
demons that look more expensive than scary. The gorgeous production
designs and sets do a rather efficient job of covering up the countless
illogical plot holes that are found in David Self's brainless script. Or
at least, to a certain point.
It sounded just peachy keen. A haunted house movie with a talented
director and top-notch cast, in a season devoid of anything resembling
it. The audience is expecting a scary thrill ride, what they will get is
a wonderfully produced movie with a terrible execution.
Liam Neeson (in his second big summer outing, along with The Phantom
Menace) is a paranormal psychologist named Dr. Marrow, who has gathered
three patients who suffer from insomnia and invited them for a week at
Hill House - a freaky gothic mansion with a frightening decor. He
informs them that the purpose of this trip is to help them overcome
their sleep disorders. Really, he is conducting an experiment about the
dimensions of fear, and how it will affect certain individuals over
prolonged periods of time. The house itself has an erratic past (but I
won't get into the details).
The invited trio of guests are Theodora (Catherine Zeta-Jones), Eleanor
(Lili Taylor) and Luke (Owen Wilson). All three suffer from insomnia,
but for different reasons; Theo and Luke find their lives stressful and
can't settle down at night, and Eleanor has had a troubled past that's
been plaguing her for years. With these patients, Dr. Marrow wants to
ignite their imaginations and study all the effects the mansion has on
them. What the good doctor doesn't realize is that all the stories and
folklore he's heard about Hill House may just be true, and the place
could very well be haunted.
The spooky sets of The Haunting steal the movie with ease. The shoddy
set-up is aided immensely by the interior designs of the mansion, as the
characters explore them in awe. Production designer Eugenio Zanetti has
outdone himself, making the film atmospheric and creepy with an
ingenious array of statues and interior decorations. If only the script
were so effective. While the surroundings manage to cover up some of the
plot holes inconspicuously, many are left exposed. Major complaints that
I had: Dr. Marrow's two assistants, who are present for one night until
an accident occurs and they drive off to the hospital (never to be seen
again, I might add). But worse: the fact that when they are gone and
things become intense, the remaining foursome must `wait until morning'
to leave, as the caretaker and his wife have gone home.
The Haunting expects too much from the viewer. We're supposed to accept
the story even as it gets exceedingly ludicrous, and tests our patience
with plot turns that seem remarkably stupid. In the last half hour, the
film turns into a typical 90's special effects extravaganza, combining
elements from Poltergeist and The Shining to create a freak show of
shifting walls and floating ghosts that look like the Ghost of Christmas
Future. This could be fun for some people, but most will find it quite
ridiculous. Screams could in fact be muted by tiny giggles, the result
of a once-creepy mood crossing over into unintentional amusement. The
finale, though spectacular, is the least frightening aspect of The
Haunting.
Taylor is the only actor that has some sort of an emotional impact. She
struggles valiantly trying to keep her character's actions plausible,
but they derail with the rest of the movie eventually (she says `but the
children need me!' so often I felt rather ill). Neeson has never been so
dull, but he's not to blame. Zeta-Jones and Wilson don't serve much of a
purpose, besides cracking jokes and looking confused and/or scared with
the goings-on around them. Many things could have been smoother, for
instance: the first appearance of this creepy mansion could have been
memorable, but instead we get the scraggly old caretaker (played by
Bruce Dern) answering the gate and bickering sarcastically.
The Haunting is disappointing, but it has it's rewards. The marvelous
score by Jerry Goldsmith, the special effects and sets - they are all
tidbits of enjoyment in a movie that gets lost too easily in a sea of
murkiness.
MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton:  http://welcome.to/movieviews
......................

Author
Walter Frith
'The Haunting' was originally a small budgeted film from 1963 with the
same name.  In 1999, this version of 'The Haunting' is such a
stupendously bad film that it's tough to know where I should begin. 
It's written in wooden fashion by David Self, based on the novel 'The
Haunting of Hill House' by Shirley Jackson.  I didn't think that camera
man turned academic director Jan DeBont could make a worse film than
1997's 'Speed 2: Cruise Control' but he has.  'The Haunting' is a gothic
style of film making that is protracted, muddled, and doesn't seem to
know where its high points are and to make the most of them when they
try and come up.
My parents took me to Disney World in Florida in 1976 for the first time
when I was eleven and there was a ride called 'The Haunted Mansion'. 
You sit in one of those carnival cars and ride through a simulated
haunted house and as you do so, a tricky light show makes you believe
that you are seeing ghosts everywhere.  At one point you even pass by a
mirror and it seems that a ghost is sitting between you and your
companion.  That five minute ride was more entertaining than this film.
In 'The Haunting', it's tag line is...SOME HOUSES ARE BORN BAD.  Maybe
they knew when they had their finished project that it was such an
abysmal accomplishment, they decided to blame it on the house where most
of the setting takes place.  : - )  You could also make the argument
that the film is entirely disrespectful to anyone who loves horror
movies.
Lili Taylor plays Eleanor Vance, a woman who took care of her mother for
the last eleven years before the sick woman died.  After her death, mom
left her property to her other daughter who seemingly did nothing to
serve her mother in her final years and she and her husband want Eleanor
out of the house.  Eleanor's sister and husband are horrid people who
are materialistic, cut throat and devious.  
Eleanor answers an ad in the paper that will pay her nine hundred
dollars per week (she needs the money now that she's homeless) where a
doctor (Liam Neeson) needs people to fill a study depicting the effects
and causes of insomnia.  Others who answer the ad are a trendy babe
named Theodora (Catherine Zeta Jones), a woman who aches to be a fashion
victim and brags about her huge spending habits and is every credit
card's nightmare. Last there is Luke (Owen Wilson), a character that is
completely wasted as we never get to know anything about him or who he
really is.
The wasted cast gather at an old mansion with a sinister past, its
former owner more than a century ago employed children in a sweat shop
operation and their abuse led to their deaths and the house is
supposedly haunted with their troubled souls.  The characters find that
instead of being studied for their insomnia, they are tricked into be
studied for the effects of fear that plays upon them.  There is a
mythological explanation of the house's history and what the religious
overtones are meant to be and the film looks like a cross between a rare
bad episode of 'The X-Files' and out takes from the achievement a first
year film student.  The entire film spends too much time building up its
climax and when it's supposed to pay off here and there, it relies too
much on convincing the audience that special effects will work better
than the story and this is a major miscalculation.
The fate of the characters in the film's last act is the true testament
as to just how bad this film is.  You can always judge a good or bad
film by how much you care about what happens to the major players.  You
won't care a bit about anything when this film is over.  It looks more
like an instructional film shown to upcoming film technicians on how to
use special effects than it does an actual motion picture with any
redeeming qualities.  A shocking disappointment, especially coming from
Dreamworks, started and owned in part by Steven Spielberg!
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Frankie Paiva
The 1963 thriller The Haunting (based on the book by Shirley Jackson) was a
psychological thriller that creeped deep within the crevices of the human
brain, exploring mental terror and ghostly happenings, seeing the film remade
is frightening. No, it's not because of the movie, but the fact that all of
that is lost.
Doctor David Marrow (Liam Neeson) has gathered three insomniacs in the creepy
Hill House, where no one lives closer than town. So no one will be able to help
them, at night, in the dark (or so tells Mrs. Dudley, the housekeeper.) What he
tells them is a study to help them is actually his own five year study into
fear. For what reason he does this, it's uncertain, but it's a pretty flimsy
premise that doesn't work very well.
Theo, (Zeta-Jones) Eleanor, (Taylor) and Luke (Owen Wilson) are the lucky
patients. Eleanor begins receiving frightening visions, someone writes 'WELCOME
HOME ELEANOR' on a wall in blood, she begins seeing bloody footprints, and
spies a body hanging from the greenhouse rafters. At first the group believes
that she is in this for the attention, but they soon find that it is something
completely different.
The film is sort of an anti-Blair Witch, the first three fourths of the film
don't show what is after the people in the house, and it's a great effect.
Almost as great as the special effects which could have dominated the film, but
remain suprisingly restrained until the end. Of course, the good old computer
animators had to spoil everything and show us who the villain is, what he looks
like, his hair color, hobbies, etc. It is kind of fun to see the plot unfold,
but it becomes predictable very quickly.
While the film has some good moments (including an excellent performance from
Taylor, who was a good choice, even if most of the audience has probably never
heard of her) the film still remains incredibly flawed. Flashy special effects
and a good cast can't really help The Haunting (especially for those that saw
the original) and for that I give it ** 1/2 stars.

Author
John Beachem
Before entering "The Haunting", it's important for the viewer to consider what
kind of movie they're looking for. If it's a terrifying horror movie, look
elsewhere. If it's a special effects extravaganza with fine acting and some of
the best sets ever seen, this is the movie to see. It should also be noted that
as a remake of the chilling original, the film is not quite up to par. If taken
on its own merits however, this is a rather fun, brainless summer movie.
Dr. David Marrow is a professor whose speciality is fear. Taking a group of
subjects consisting of the timid Eleanor; the perky, gorgeous Theo, and the
goofy Owen, he travels to Hill House. Hill House is a tremendous mansion in the
middle of nowhere which has a rather checkered past (I don't want to say more,
as further explanation would be a spoiler). Dr. Marrow does not, however, tell
the group that they are there to examine the effects of fear. They are
supposedly there to cure the insomnia experienced by the group. Upon reaching
the house, it slowly dawns on the three, and eventually on Dr. Marrow, that the
house is indeed haunted, and out for their blood. The house seems to take a
special interest in Eleanor. As the nights go by, the house becomes more and
more dangerous.
I was rather disappointed at the bad reviews this recieved (except from the
always reliable Roger Ebert). So many critics seemed to grade this based
entirely on how it compared to the original. If viewed on its own merits, I
found this to be quite an enjoyable film. The acting is quite good, although
the characters really are underwritten. The standout in my opinion is Liam
Neeson, but I've always been a fan of his. The one person I was not so
impressed by was Lili Taylor, though she seems to be receiving all the praise
from other critics. Owen Wilson does get a little annoying at times, but for
the most part he adds some neccesary comic relief.
The greatest part of this film is amazingly not the visuals, though they are
impressive. It is the house itself, that steals the show. Filled with long,
dark corridors which seem to lead to nowhere, and are filled with chilling (and
sometimes moving!) statues, the house is truly awe inspiring. The fireplace,
and its possible denizens, is one of the few truly frightening parts of the
film.
This brings us to the flaws, and there are quite a few of them. As I mentioned
before, the characters are very underwritten. We know nothing about Dr. Marrow,
Theo, or Owen, and very little about Eleanor. The dialagoue is, at times,
positively abysmal. For example, Liam Neeson climbs a very rickety flight of
stairs to help an apparently suicidal Eleanor. The stairs collapse, all over
the place, and Owen points at them, open mouthed saying "Look, the stairs are
falling." My only other really major complaint is the film's end, which was
really quite terrible. Eleanor confronts the evil spirit in a huge (but
strangely disappointing)special effects event, while spouting out some sort of
strange speech about family values!
As I stated earlier, do not see this film if you want a terrifying horror
movie. It simply doesn't inspire much fear. However, I do reccomend it simply
to see the amazing, bone chilling sets. For this, some fine visual effects, and
some good acting, "The Haunting" earns three and a half stars.
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com

Author
Harvey S. Karten
   Based on its trailers, "The Haunting" comes across as an
antidote to "The Blair Witch Project," but here's a case in
which the corrective is worse than the venom.  Whereas the
highly overrrated "Blair" flaunts its forbearance of special
effects, tightly-written dialogue, and big-name performers,
"The Haunting" resembles a glorified ride through a Coney
Island spook ride as Donald Trump would have constructed it.
If "The Blair Witch Project" suffers from a kind of reverse
pretension--claiming a blessing from its avoidance of fancy
pyrotechnics and seeking the most naturalistic adventure
possible in a horror movie--"The Haunting" goes to the
opposite extreme.  Director Jan de Bont, known for the razzle
he put into the exciting movie "Speed" and the subsequent
dud "Twister," proves himself unable to break away from
depending on dazzle to substitute for substance.  Based on
Shirley Jackson's novel "The Haunting of Hill House," which
mercifully leaves the terror to the reader's imagination, the
Dreamworks release relies almost completely on kitschy
imagery, vapid dialogue, and an all-too-literal replica of
purgatory to stimulate the fancy of moviegoers that still retain
an smidgen of imagination in an age of visual overload.
   The only scary part of the movie occurs at the very
beginning as Eleanor (Lili Taylor) is told by her sister that she
is to be dispossesed of her home per her deceased mother's
will.  Having no family, no friends, and now no place to live,
the mousy Nell becomes desperate, grasping eagerly at a
newspaper ad calling for volunteers for research that could
help insomniacs like her.  Unknown to her, Dr. David Marrow
(Liam Neeson), who is conducting the inquiry, is more
interested in exploring the nature of fear and has set up his
experiment in a spacious gothic mansion that had existed
somewhere in New England since 1837.  Conveniently, the
estate is unoccupied, looked after by a caretaker (Bruce
Dern) and his wife (Marian Seldes), neither of whom ventures
near the place after dark.  In fact the caretaker locks the gate
securely when he leaves each evening.
   At the house, Nell meets Dr. Jeffrey Marrow and two other
subjects for the experiment, Theo (Catherine Zeta-Jones) and
Luke (Owen Wilson)--both cockier and more confident than
she.  As things begin to creak and groan and move and
moan in the night, Nell starts to lose it and is comforted by
her fellow subjects and the doctor.  Not long after that,
though, all who occupy the house are convinced that it is
haunted.  After all, you don't often see giant arms reaching
out from a multiplicity of gargoyles and assorted diabolic
creatures every day, all seemingly intent on drowning,
burning, strangling or otherwise acting in an unfriendly
manner toward the residents.  
   As the performers strut and cower about the house, the
corridors resound with ominous noises.  Doors close
suddenly and loudly, ghostly children crawl inside the sheets
and float about the rooms, and ultimately an enormous
painting of the home's diabolic owner comes to life like a
Dickensian ghost of Christmas-Yet-To-Come, challenging little
Nell in a conclusive duel to the death.
   Lily Taylor comes off surprisingly well.  Once known as the
queen of the indies for her role in small, creative movies like
"I Shot Andy Warhol," she takes on a role in a big budget
movie and does what she can with as the only character with
any development.  By contrast the sensuous Catherine Zeta-
Jones and the current cover-man of TimeOutNY magazine,
Owen Wilson as the third subject of the experiment, Luke,
have little to do but become wide-eyed as the mansion takes
on a life of its own.  Ms. Zeta-Jones hints at the bisexuality of
her character, but nothing comes of this.
   Despite the unintentionally comic moves made by the
torsoes and heads of the figures that inhabit the walls and
floors of the incredible Hill House, the movie will perhaps be
nominated for an academy award for its production design,
which Eugenia Zenetti ("What Dreams May Come") has
created with an inspiration from the Harlaxton and Belvoir
Castle in Leicestershire, England.  The outside is not a set
but the Harlaxton Manor in England's Nottinghamshire, a
building now used as a foreign campus of Indiana's University
of Evansville.  
   Though I have not read Ms. Jackson's story, I am a fan of
her scariest, most allegorical tale, "The Lottery," about a
group of rural townspeople who hold a drawing each year to
determine which resident gets stoned to death.  The little
movie that came out of that novella remained true to the
book's creative dialogue, hence retaining the fright and
resonance of the printed page.  "The Haunting," by contrast,
stands as yet another fragment of evidence that more is often
less.

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     For me there are three ghost stories on film that I would put in
my first tier-these are the best.  Those are THE UNINVITED, THE
INNOCENTS, and THE HAUNTING (1963).  The second tier would include THE
LEGEND OF HELL HOUSE, THE CHANGELING, and THE LADY IN WHITE.  There
would probably be a few others.  The third tier would probably include
POLTERGEIST, effective but a little soul-less.  In interviews about the
new THE HAUNTING from The Dreamworks, this second film based on the
novel THE HAUNTING OF HILL HOUSE by Shirley Jackson, director Jan de
Bont (SPEED, TWISTER) said that he was not really approaching this as a
horror film. What he wanted was to make was a different sort of action
film. Audiences are tired of traditional crime action films, but not
many have been done as horror.  Given that that is the case, it is
remarkable that the new THE HAUNTING is as good as it is at raising
gooseflesh.  For now I would put it in the second tier.  I may or may
not feel that positive on the film in five years.  Time and again de
Bont does wrong what director Robert Wise did so very right in the 1963
version.  Part of what made the original film effective is that the
main character was weak.  We could empathize with her rather than
admire her and we saw the film from inside her head, even to the point
of hearing her thoughts. The horror in the 1963 version is almost all
heard rather than seen. There is just a hint that is visual that any of
this is really happening.  Wise had to use very three-dimensional
characters to make the people and the threat to them seem real.
Today's younger action audience might not have responded to that, so
instead de Bont gives us some strong characters and the scariest
haunted house money can buy. There are more special effects in the
trailer to the new film than Wise put into the entirety of his version.
     Eleanor Lance (played by Lili Taylor) gets an invitation to be
part of a sleep study by Dr. Jeffrey Marrow (Liam Neeson).  The study
will have her staying in a huge old mansion dating back to 1837.  The
house was built by a textile magnate and was the scene of much
unhappiness. Eleanor's fellow test subjects include the seductive
Theodora (Catherine Zeta-Jones) and the irreverent Luke Sannerson (Owen
Wilson).  What none of the subjects knows is that the study is not
about sleep but about fear.  Marrow is intentionally putting them into
a frightening house to observe their reaction.  As Marrow says "you
don't tell the rats the rats will be in a maze."  But the house may be
scarier than he realizes. Even Marrow does not know the full history of
evil in this house or of the spirits of the original master among
others who still make the house their home.  While starting with the
plot from the book and the original film, this plot goes off in some
new directions.  Jerry Goldsmith makes his own comment on the profusion
of haunting phenomena we see in this film by starting his end-credit
music with a carnival theme.
     There are far too many touches in this film that just seem weak
after having seen the Robert Wise version (two nights earlier, in
fact).  In the original the groundskeeper and housekeeper seem to have
been taken over by the spirit of the house and themselves seem to be a
bit haunted. In this version they just come off as mean.  Bruce Dern
plays the groundskeeper as just his usual nasty, bullying character.
It is not as effective as weaker-than-the-house characters in the
original.  But de Bont has a hard time doing weak characters.  This
version makes much more use of the early residents of Hill House,
particularly the industrialist who built it and who here looks a lot
like the early makeup designs for THE PLANET OF THE APES.  De Bont
replaces the mysterious seductive evil of the house with too great an
abundance of strange phenomena.  If Hill House is getting this
treatment from the spirits, are not there a lot of places in which
greater evils occurred. Why do we not see this degree of haunting more
places?
     The production design is credited to Eugenio Zanetti.  If that
name does not sound familiar consider that he performed the same
function on such beautiful films as FLATLINERS, RESTORATION, and WHAT
DREAMS MAY COME. Zanetti won the Academy Award for set design for
RESTORATION and was nominated (and deserved to win) for WHAT DREAMS MAY
COME.  The Hill House he designed would be a dominating spirit even if
there were no haunting.  I hope Jan de Bont realizes how very much he
owes to Zanetti for making this film as good as it is.
     This version of THE HAUNTING would be a better film by another
name.  On its own it is actually quite a good ghost story about what is
the most incredibly haunted house the screen has yet seen.  By inviting
comparison to one of the three best ghost stories on film, this action-
oriented version comes up a poor second.  But if we had to have a
graphic version of Jackson's novel, this is far better than any we
could have expected.  I give it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low +2
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Author
Ross Anthony
Right up until the end, I wanted to praise this movie; but the less than
satisfying climax stole my thunder. Hell, I'm going to steal it back!
(There's got to be a little praise I can scare up.)
The greatest thing about this film is so often lost, ill-achieved or simple
forgotten in others. It's the mighty undercurrent churning beneath the murky
green surface. It's the feeling a film sets spinning inside it's viewers
hearts -- ever so delicately at first, until finally it's charging like a
locomotive. Though on the screen, only wide eyes and peeked ears hint of it.
When I was a I child, I lived in an old wooden house two blocks from the
train tracks. I slept up on the third floor. When a freight train tumbled by
in the wee hours of the morning, that old frame house would rattle and
shake, even sway; my bed would rock. Perhaps that should be scary, but I
came to like it. And now that I sleep in the land of earthquakes; when a
tremor rocks my bed, I don't wake up ... I have eerie, yet sweet reminiscent
dreams of home.
That's the kind of unseen enchantment, "The Haunting" so aptly sets spinning
like a huge magnificent gyroscope on a string. The hovering motion and quiet
driving force of the twisting top is hampered neither by imperfections in
the string, nor by gravity.
I simply praise "The Haunting" for this marvelous achievement. The kind of
scary that lures you, that you truly believe is good, and yet sets shivers
down your spine because you know it could just as easily be otherwise.
Though the ending simply isn't good enough for the fine footage prior, my
overwhelming feeling of the film is still that mighty enchantment. It's
visually beautiful. In fact, the press kit had so many great photographs
that I found selecting one to print a difficult task. The looming mansion
and each set within are absolutely magnificent, each room, each door.  I'm
giving this an A- for thickly rich visuals and the ability to stir up a
wondrously chilling undercurrent.
Starring Lili Taylor, Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones and Owen Wilson.
Directed by Jan De Bont. Screenplay by David Self based upon "The Haunting
of Hill House" by Shirley Jackson. Produced by Susan Arnold, Donna Roth,
Colin Wilson at Dream Works/Roth-Arnold. Rated PG-13.
Grade ......................................... A-
(C) 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted and shot
documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across North
America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Bob Bloom

 The Haunting (1999) 1/2 star out of 4. Starring Liam Neeson, Catherine
Zeta-Jones, Owen Wilson and Lili Taylor. Directed by Jan De Bont.
 "The Haunting"  the original, 1963 Robert Wise-directed version  is one
of the scariest films in the history of cinema.
 And it follows the precepts of two old grand masters of the horror genre
 Boris Karloff and Vincent Price. Both said on more than one occasion
that the most frightening terror was not what was put on screen, but
what the audience conjured up in its own imagination.
 That was where Wise's "Haunting" succeeded so brilliantly. Everything
happened just out of sight. You heard noises, but never saw anything, or
something flashed by so quickly you weren't sure what you saw.
 The same cannot be said for a very lame remake of "The Haunting" released
by DreamWorks. It is about as scary as a haunted house ride at a kiddie
park.
 At a screening of the movie, audience members laughed during scenes that
were supposed to make them scream.
 Everything in this new version of "The Haunting" is bigger, especially the
house, the sets and the special effects. It looks like more money was
poured into these than into financing an adequate script.
 Calling the screenplay for "The Haunting" mediocre gives it more credit
than it is due.
 "The Haunting" is a dud, a big disappointment, a letdown.
It reeks of cynicism.
 And I'm angry because Hollywood  in its infinite idiocy  has once again
taken a classic and tried to "improve" on it not through the story but
by using bells and whistles. I curse movie executives who continually
underestimate, condescend and show utter contempt for moviegoers by
releasing crap such as "The Haunting." Their penalty should be an eternity
in purgatory with continuous showings of this abomination coupled with
the remake of "The Wild Wild West."
 You could get more chills standing in front of an open refrigerator than
by watching "The Haunting."
 In the original, a scientist invited a group of test subjects  most of
whom had paranormal powers such as ESP  to spend time with him in an
evil, old house. The doctor wanted to prove that ghosts and evil spirits
did exist. Those who joined him knew from the outset what they were in
for.
 In this remake, a scientist (Liam Neeson, in a very weak role) invites
three people to join him in a spooky old castle ostensibly to study
insomnia, but in reality, he is conducting experiments in fear. Of
course, he fails to let his subjects know what he's doing, but, hey, I
guess scientists today also have seen a sharp decline in ethics.
 So tagging along with Neeson are Lili Taylor's Eleanor, who is a bit
off-kilter after spending the past 11 years caring for her demanding
invalid mother; Catherine Zeta-Jones' Theo, a bisexual artist; and Owen
Wilson's Luke, a wise-cracking cynic.
 It's not even worth the time or effort to go into the specifics of the
plot.
 Let's just say there's a gratuitous decapitation inserted solely for
shock value; a ghost who's about as scary as Casper; and a silly looking
haunted house that can pass as a refugee from a Scooby-Doo cartoon.
 The interior of the house looks as if it were decorated by the same people
who did the Nostromo in "Alien."
 Director Jan De Bont, the man who gave us "Speed" and "Twister," seems to be
in a slump. Prior to this he directed the dreadful sequel "Speed 2:
Cruise Control." Perhaps the three-strikes law should be applied to movie
directors. If so, De Bont would be a prime candidate.
 "The Haunting" is dull, dreadful and plodding. It's about as scary as "Bela
Lugosi Meets a Brooklyn Gorilla." The only thing scarier would be if
DreamWorks decides to do a sequel.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net.

Author
Mark O'Hara
Visit Online Film Critics Society at http://www.ofcs.org
If you've read Shirley Jackson's short story "The Lottery," you know the 
woman can spin a tale.  Her 1959 novel THE HAUNTING OF HILL HOUSE is the 
basis for Jan De Bont's film, a mostly successful adaptation with 
state-of-the-art special effects and even some of the psychology handed down 
from Jackson's disturbing narrative.
The opening sequence brings us into the apartment and the life of Eleanor 
Vance (Lili Taylor), an early middle-aged woman whose mother has just died.  
Eleanor had cared for the woman for the last several years, and Eleanor's 
sister, her husband and bratty son are now making sure Eleanor gets the 
short end of the stick.  She will inherit her mother's old Gremlin 
automobile, and get evicted from the apartment.  Because she has not much to 
lose, Eleanor decides to take a break of sorts, and after a telephone 
solicitation, decides to take part in a study of sleep disorders.
Dr. Jeffrey Marrow - an excellent name - is running the study.  Marrow (Liam 
Neeson) is in fact a behavioral scientist seeking to assemble a controlled 
study group, for the purpose of examining his subjects' reactions to fear.  
That his actions are unethical doesn't motivate him to inform the sleep 
deprived trio of the true nature of the study.  He says, "You don't tell the 
rats they're really in a maze."
Thus we sit through the convention of the group assembling at a remote 
country house - Hill House - the estate of the textile magnate Hugh Crane.  
The three insomniacs arrive separately, a nice way for director De Bont to 
characterize them.  After Eleanor is shown to her room by the mysterious, 
taciturn wife of the caretaker, we meet the second of the group, Theo 
(Catherine Zeta-Jones).  Then Luke Sanderson (Owen Wilson) comes in, and we 
get to see more of the house.  Although this exposition goes rather slowly 
for modern audiences, it is backed up well by the old house itself.  In 
reality a school in England, the mansion seems to be overdecorated in every 
room, gothic touches and rococo flares everywhere.  Eleanor's bedroom has 
the feel of a deconsecrated chapel, filigreed trim leaking from the ceilings 
and walls.  A definite motif is the statues of children, their carved 
likenesses covering mantels throughout the house.  Marrow later explains 
that the builder of the house was childless, his wife having had many 
stillborn children before her suicide.
Where does the haunting come in?  Well, the interesting premise is that Dr. 
Marrow believes he is witnessing fictions and myths latent in the 
imaginations of his subjects.  Let their minds work in the night, he 
figures, and they will fall victim to fears they themselves haven woven.  So 
it is not until far into Eleanor's ordeals with the supernatural that Marrow 
begins to lend any credence to her behaviors.
It turns out of course that the long-dead Crane took a terrible secret to 
his grave, a secret still kept prisoner in the house.  The rest of the 
narrative follows Eleanor's quest to expose the momentous truth and to free 
the restless souls held captive.
The biggest performance here is Lili Taylor's.  This actress casts an 
amazing emotive truth upon her expressions, shedding tears or grimacing or 
acting blankly shocked, just this side of insanity.  An Academy Award 
nomination for Best Supporting Actress might be in order here.
Catherine Zeta-Jones does a nice job in a rather different role for her.  
Here Theodora is full of zest and guts, a switch-hitting and aggressive 
female who dares you to tell her she dresses sluttishly.  (At only one point 
does Zeta-Jones' Scottish accent, unfamiliar to most American movie-goers, 
slip through, when she shouts in anger at Dr. Marrow for his scientific 
remoteness.)  Theo makes for a nice contrast with the plainer Eleanor, 
without seeming superior.  And she's a great foil for Owen Wilson's 
fast-talking, rather hypochondriacal Luke.  Wilson lends the most comic 
relief to the story, appearing sometimes like a spacey clown;  nevertheless, 
he is protective of Eleanor when she begins to make claims about the 
horrendous history of the house.
Always reliable, Liam Neeson has a way in this film of making his presence 
strong yet quiet.  He's the doctor in charge of the study, watching from the 
background and recording his observations on a mini-recorder that Eleanor 
actually finds and plays once.  But Neeson is also careful not to overact, 
especially during one sequence in which he convinces his superior that it is 
necessary to set up the study by keeping the subjects in ignorance.  After a 
few more movies, Neeson will have the reputation of being as consistent and 
reliable as the best actors in the history of film.  Traces of slight brogue 
are just enough to fascinate American fans, giving the big man an edge over 
actors with more familiar dialects.
The bottom line is that "The Haunting" is solid but not outstanding.  Three 
stars out of four, a B+ -- whatever your rating, the film will supply you 
with some nifty visual thrills, and best of all, some delicious 
psychological ones.  Long after her death, Shirley Jackson is still an 
American writer with a talent for the fright-tale.


Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
I've noticed that critics all too often miss the point of movies these
days. Increasingly, film criticism seems to revolve around the process
of holding movies up to an invisible yardstick, with the film's
quality determined by its literary merit, or how well its themes
compare to established genre classics. Or, in English: movies are
often panned because they're not sophisticed enough. Although I've
probably been guilty of such cinematic elitism myself, I'm no longer
sure this is the right way to judge a film. Come on, admit it: there's
something to be said for a story which knows it isn't Great Art. After
all, movies were intended to be diversionary entertainment from the
very first days of cinema-- a way of temporarily forgetting about
life's problems and immersing one's self in another world. Despite a
century of evolution in the cinematic arts, audiences still haven't
lost their love for the occasional bit of passive, no-thought-required
entertainment. That's good news indeed for The Haunting, the new film
from Jan de Bont (Twister), which purports to be an adaptation of
Shirley Jackson's classic horror novel The Haunting of Hill House.  It
actuality, it bears only a passing resemblance to Jackson's work. 
First things first: The Haunting knows its place. It's not a great
movie, but it never tries to be. It only wants to generate good
old-fashion chills, the kind Bela Lugosi and Boris Karloff used to
scare up before audiences became jaded. And because the film is
unconcerned with anything other than providing visual (and visceral)
delights with all the bravado it can manage, it succeeds more often
than not at being entertaining. Its eagerness to please is strangely
affecting in that regard. 
The story: a psychologist named Dr. Marrow (Liam Nesson) is sponsoring
an insomnia study at Hill House, a gothic mansion straight out of Tim
Burton's wet dreams. The three volunteers who respond to Marrow's open
call for test subjects are a varied lot: there's the shy Eleanor (Lili
Taylor), sex goddess Theo (Catherine Zeta-Jones), and the bullish Luke
(Owen Wilson), all of whom are initially apprehensive about the
experiment but eventually come around. But Dr. Marrow has more tricks
up his sleeve: he's not a sleep doctor at all, but a scientist
studying the nature of fear. He plans to use his subjects to determine
why people react in certain ways when they're afraid. But Dr. Marrow
soon finds himself with much more than he bargained for after a number
of supernatural occurances begin to manifest themselves. 
Visually, The Haunting can not be faulted. The film contains some of
the most stunning sets and locations ever to grace a movie screen,
with dark, brooding shadows that tell us more about the house's untold
secrets than any amount of dialogue could ever hope to convey.
Everything looks great, with no shortage of atmosphere. The chills the
movie desperately wants us to feel are quite present during many parts
of the tale-- I nearly leapt out of my seat during a particularly
tense fireplace scene. 
The story is, alas, a somewhat weaker link. The biggest problem is the
slightly rough script which feels rushed-- not so much bad as
unfocused.  While Eleanor gets some token character development
throughout the course of the tale, we learn nothing whatsoever about
anyone else here with the possible exception of the house itself,
which becomes as much a character as any of the actors. And it's
always a shame when Liam Neeson, one of the finest actors working
today, is given nothing of consequence to do. 
Are these flaws severe enough to prevent audiences from enjoying the
movie? Probably not: most horror fans know that the plots in these
sorts of movies are absolute jokes, so we cheerfully overlook the
flaws as long as the movie delivers the desired level of creepiness.
And while The Haunting is not a horror classic, it does have enough
going on to make it consistently interesting. It's a fun,
slightly-above-average shudderfest that will promptly vanish from your
mind the instant you walk out of the theater. This is not a film
you'll carry with you the rest of your life, but if you're just
looking for some pleasant scares, you'll probably have a good time.
The cacophony of lights and sound also make it worthwhile for fans of
quality special effects. 

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write to:
joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
----
"Average Joe" Barlow  (jbarlow@earthling.net)  MiSTie #73097
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
"The one good thing about the [life-size sticker of
 Jar Jar Binks on the door of Taco Bell] is you can
 pretty convincingly throw the SOB a roundhouse punch.
 I found it satisfying."   --Renard A. Dellafave

Author
Brian Takeshita
Okay, I admit it.  I don't really like scary movies a whole lot
because they're, well, scary.  Sometimes the ol' imagination gets
going when I'm alone at night, and the images I saw in that creepy
movie two days ago come back to haunt me.  I lie in bed under the
covers and wonder just how much I have to go to the bathroom.  Doing
so would mean putting my foot on the floor for a second, leaving
myself exposed to any number of things that might reach out from under
the bed and grab my ankle.  No, I can wait until morning.  If I can go
back to sleep, that is.
The latest film to come out of SKG Dreamworks, Jan De Bont's THE
HAUNTING, gives us chills and scares, but (lucky for me) doesn't
present us with a great deal of those indelible images that haunt us
after we've left the theater.  There's a scene, for example, when one
of the characters investigates the ashes of a large fireplace and
finds a skeleton.  What happens next caused half the theater to
collectively scream, but it's hearing the surprise of 200 people that
I'll remember, not what happened on the screen.  Phil Tippett's
effects company and the venerable Industrial Light and Magic do a
marvelous job rendering seamless computer images like moving statues
and shifting walls, but again, while the effects may be impressive,
the impression doesn't last.
The one image that has stayed with me was also the one that freaked me
out the most in the theater.  Interestingly, it was also probably the
easiest effect undertaken in the film.  Throughout the house are
carvings of children's faces - these little cherubic images that many
people find charming.  One of the characters is lying in bed and
glances over to a row of these carvings, all seemingly staring at the
wall opposite them.  She looks away for a second, and when she looks
back they have all shifted position so that they are facing her.  Very
reminiscent of that scene early in POLTERGEIST when the mother turns
away from the kitchen table, then turns back to find all the chairs
stacked up on the table.  It goes it show that sometimes the simplest
things work the best.
Unfortunately, it seems pretty obvious that the effects, rather than
the story, were meant to carry the film.  The plot revolves around
researcher Dr. Jeffrey Marrow (Liam Neeson) and three subjects he
recruits for what he says is a study of insomnia, but which is
actually a study of group fear.  As part of this study, they are to
spend several weeks in a mansion in the Berkshires known as Hill
House.  The three subjects, Eleanor (Lili Taylor), Theodora (Catherine
Zeta-Jones), and Luke (Owen Wilson) are a cross section of
personalities who are totally unaware of the true nature of their
participation.  "You don't tell the rats they're in a maze," says
Marrow.  Indeed.  Marrow's reasoning for conducting his study in the
gothicly creepy Hill House is that it's a highly suggestive
environment from which his subjects will no doubt generate their own
imagined fears.  The rest of the story in a nutshell:  Guess what, the
house really is haunted!  Mayhem ensues.
It turns out that the owner of the mansion, the late Hugh Crane, is
still in the house - yes, that's right - haunting it.  Crane
apparently built the house for children he would never have, yet
legend has it that at night, inhabitants of the nearby village would
hear children's voices.  Why this is and why the spirits of a couple
hundred children are also inhabiting the stately Crane manor is not
fully explained.  It also turns out that Eleanor has a connection to
the Crane family, and may be the only one able to free the spirits of
the children.  This is also not explained to satisfaction, and
contributes greatly to a rather poorly constructed story.  Basically,
we see things happen, but are only given superficial reasons why, and
later on, the "explanations" raise more questions than they answer.
What sort of power does Eleanor command?  Why does she have this
power?  How, exactly, was she drawn to participate in the study?
Crane had two wives?  When were we informed of this and why was this
significant?
Eleanor is the only important character in the film, and even she gets
annoying once she starts down the path toward realizing why she's
there.  Marrow, the one who was controlling the experiment, doesn't
even know what's going on until it's too late, and Theodora is a turn
off from the beginning, showing up with too much luggage and a rich
girl's attitude.  "I like your boots," admires Eleanor.  "Prada,"
explains Theodora.  "Milan, not New York."  Oh, she likes girls as
well as boys, by the way.  I don't know why they even put this in, as
it never becomes much of an issue.  As for Luke, he's just in there to
show up looking surprised when something happens.  As a result, our
emotional attachment to these characters is pretty close to zero.
There are a few good points to the film, in addition to the effects I
mentioned earlier.  Soundwise, THE HAUNTING is very rich.  The mere
sound of the mansion's heavy doors slamming shut is enough to send a
little shiver up your spine, and when things really start popping, the
theater's speakers nearly jump off the walls.  More than a few shots
by de Bont are designed to generate suspense, and they generally do so
with success.  On several occasions, for example, the camera lingers
on objects after the actors have left the scene, and our own
imaginations take over.  Did I see it move?  It's as if we're the
subjects of Dr. Marrow's study.  Oh, yeah, and the film gets a couple
of extra points for using an AMC Gremlin automobile in a few scenes.
No, I don't like the Gremlin, by hey, fits with the supernatural
theme, you know?  Unfortunately, with lackluster story which confuses
more than captivates, and effects which startle more than scare, THE
HAUNTING, like the Gremlin, turns out to be mostly a disappointment.

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Jan De Bont.
Cast: Lili Taylor, Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Owen Wilson, Bruce 
Dern, Marian Seldes, Todd Field, Alix Koromzay, Virginia Madsen, Charles 
Gunning.
1999 - 113 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for violence, mild profanity, and a bloodless beheading).
Reviewed July 24, 1999.
A spooky, haunted mansion. Four characters trapped within the locked gates of 
the property. An 80-million-dollar price-tag. Can't miss, eh? Oh, but it can; 
just leave it up the hack director Jan De Bont ("Speed" is his one good 
movie, but what's his excuse for its sequel or "Twister?") to take 
practically all traces of character development, excitement, horror, and 
common sense out of what could have been a sort of horrifying "Poltergeist" 
for the millenium, and turn it into a tedious excursion into visual effects 
that never look very believable or threatening to begin with. 
Loosely based on the 1959 novel by Shirley Jackson, "The Haunting of Hill 
House," and subsequently, the 1963 film adaptation, Jan De Bont has unwisely 
decided that this '99 version of "The Haunting" should abandon the previous 
film's psychological aspect in which you never actually saw the dangerous 
entity, in place of visually showing us a house that has come alive, thanks 
to spiffy effects. Believe me; it sounds better than the final product, 
which, when it all gets right down to it in the third act, is a hugely 
disappointing anticlimax that leaves you asking, "that's all there is?" 
Eleanor Vance (Lili Taylor) is a lonely young woman who is coping with the 
recent death of her domineering mother, whom she has had to take care of for 
the past eleven years, and her older sister (Virginia Madsen) is threatening 
to take her apartment away from her. Finding an ad in the newspaper in which 
Dr. David Marrow (Liam Neeson) is seeking out insomniacs for research who 
will be paid $900 a week with free room and board, Eleanor eagerly signs up. 
Once arriving at Hill House, a heavily gated and locked, brooding mansion of 
epic proportions, Eleanor becomes in awe of the sheer size of the place, with 
the 50-foot doorways, secret passageways, people and animal statues, a 
walk-in fireplace, and a swirling room made of glass and mirrors that plays 
carousel music when the door is opened. Also showing up for the experiment is 
Theodora (Catherine Zeta-Jones), a bisexual artist and city gal; Luke (Owen 
Wilson), the comic relief; and Dr. Marrow's assistants (Alix Koromzay, Todd 
Field). What the group doesn't know is that Dr. Marrow is actually doing a 
study on fear, and has taken them to this creepy architectural triumph that 
has quite a twisted past to observe their reactions to any 
out-of-the-ordinary trick he plays on them. What Dr. Marrow doesn't 
anticipate is that the place really is haunted by the now-deceased past 
resident, Hugh Crane (Charles Gunning), who once murdered a bunch of children 
whose souls, to this day, are stuck within the woodwork of the house. 
"The Haunting" has a great set-up. Perhaps too good, since it sets up the 
viewer in the first thirty minutes for a highly-anticipated funhouse of 
thrills and chills in the finale, which ultimately never comes. As Eleanor 
and Theo first meet and explore the monstrous hallways and rooms before the 
other guests arrive, not only is the film enthralling, but the dialogue is 
snappy and fun. We also see that there are many opportunities to be had if 
the house really is going to come alive by the end. Helping out the opening 
section is the extravagant production design by Eugenio Zanetti, which really 
is a sight to behold, and paints the house as a character all its own. 
Indie-staple Lili Taylor is the star of the film in one of her few studio 
pictures, the ravishing Catherine Zeta-Jones is present, and so is Liam 
Neeson. So much talent! And yet, the movie goes straight down the crapper 
after the aforementioned first act.
A day after seeing the picture, one main question plagues me: with such an 
atmospheric setting with so much obvious potential, how could director De 
Bont fail so miserably on every cinematic level? The middle section of the 
film is slow-paced and uninteresting (save for the only suspenseful scene in 
the movie, and the only "haunting" sequence in which we never actually see 
anything), and yet we stick with the film because we know that all hell is 
literally going to break loose in the climax. Well, the action, special 
effects and "horror" sure do kick in in the final act, but the movie somehow 
never takes off. Once a certain part would pick up speed, it would abruptly 
slow to a halt, and then jumpstart, and then stop again, and then...you get 
the picture. As for the effects, they are relatively underwhelming, never 
actually real-looking, and aren't used to their fullest potential. And, 
finally, the only horror to be present was from hearing the horrifically bad 
dialogue uttered each time someone would open their mouth.
Every actor in "The Haunting" is clearly above this mediocre material. Poor 
Lili Taylor, one of the most generally underrated actresses of today, is the 
only one given an actual character to work with, but as the movie limps to 
its end, she was gradually forced to say some of the most sickeningly 
cornball lines of dialogue I've ever witnessed ("Its not about you. It's 
about family!"). I'm sorry, but not Meryl Streep, not Jodie Foster, not the 
most talented actress in the whole wide world, whoever that may be, could get 
away with these lines without sounding ridiculous. When Catherine Zeta-Jones 
(so captivating in "Entrapment") enters the picture, I thought she was going 
to single-handedly steal the picture with her spicy character and dialogue. 
Not so. After 45 minutes, Zeta-Jones practically disappears into the 
background, running around without anything substantial to do or say. Liam 
Neeson, as in his lackluster turn in "Star Wars, Episode 1: The Phantom 
Menace," is doing nothing but cashing a paycheck, and even Owen Wilson made 
no impression (I found myself more entranced by his oddly-shaped nose that 
actually looks like an inappropriate phallic symbol, since there was no 
actual character there to work with). And how about Dr. Marrow's assistants? 
Well, on the first night of the stay, one of them is hurt and so the other 
one drives her to the hospital, promising to call to let everyone know if she 
would be alright. You're never gonna believe this, but we don't hear from 
them again. Let it be known that the one assistant is played by Todd Field, 
who also appeared in the Kubrick masterpiece, "Eyes Wide Shut," and in this 
movie has a literal total of about three or four lines of dialogue! Here's 
another giant inconsistency: when the two assistants drive off, Dr. Marrow 
unlocks the gate with a key, but at the end of the movie when they are at the 
gate trying to get away from the angry spirits, he doesn't even think to use 
it!
"The Haunting" is one of the most misguided big-screen diversions to come 
along in some time, considering the clear potential it has. Here we have what 
could have been a creaky, scary, haunting, big-budget extravaganza, and yet, 
De Bont misses every single chance he gets to frighten us (well, ok, there 
was one scene, concerning a skeleton, that had the whole audience, including 
myself, jump out of their seats, but that was just more of a shock than an 
actual scare). Meanwhile, the actors stand around struggling to bring some 
sort of life to characters that are lifeless, and the audience is bored out 
of their skulls, unless they decide to make fun of the movie, which is a 
definite option to consider. What a shame! The tagline for "The Haunting" is 
"It's Summer. It's Hot. Time For a Movie That Gives You a Chill." Yep, at 
least they got that right. Its name is "The Blair Witch Project," and it was 
made for approximately 1/40,000 the budget of "The Haunting." So much for 
putting money to good use.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman.
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Author
Greg King
THE HAUNTING (M).  
(Dreamworks/UIP)
Director: Jan De Bont
Stars: Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Lili Taylor, Owen Wilson, Bruce 
Dern, Marian Seldes, Todd Field, Virginia Madsen
Running time: 115 minutes.
Robert Wise's The Haunting, his 1963 adaptation of Shirley
Jackson's novel The Haunting Of Hill House, is still highly regarded
as an effectively spooky film and a classic of the haunted house
genre.  In this unnecessary and boring remake, Jan De Bont, the former
cinematographer turned director (Speed, Twister, etc) throws $100
million worth of special effects and Gothic production design at the
screen, but the final result lacks any sort of shocks and thrills.
The Haunting is a rather dull, tired and clichd horror
film.  It is also incredibly silly!  The script features some of the
most banal and clichd dialogue uttered in a mainstream film for
several years, and will induce more groans than the supposed ghost
story.  Liam Neeson gives his most somnambulistic performance since
The Phantom Menace - it's interesting to note that the bigger the
budget, the more lacklustre his performance.
Neeson plays Dr Marrow, a psychologist who is conducting
studies into the dynamics of fear.  Under the guise of conducting an
experiment for insomnia, Marrow lures three young subjects to the
creepy 130 year old Hill House for a week.  Nell (indie regular Lili
Taylor, recently seen in Pecker) has spent the past eleven years
caring for her terminally ill mother, and is eager for a chance to
earn some money.  Theo (Catherine Zeta-Jones) is a brash, bisexual
artist, while Luke (Owen Wilson) is a cynical, irresponsible joker.
Marrow feeds the group stories about the sprawling mansion's
history - a childless industrialist who built numerous rooms for the
children he would never had - to unnerve them, and settles back to
monitor their reactions.  Unfortunately, the house is genuinely
haunted by the ghosts of hundreds of dead children lured to the
mansion.  The house is also possessed by the malevolent spirit of the
increasingly deranged and bitter millionaire.  The ghostly apparitions
seem to respond to something in the sensitive Nell, who is slowly
seduced by the house's invisible spirits.  Meanwhile, the rest of the
group react towards the mysterious noises and other inexplicable
phenomena as the possessed house seems to come alive.
De Bont and his technical crew throw a barrage of computer
generated effects at the screen, but there is very little here that is
genuinely scary or unsettling.  The film certainly looks impressive,
due largely to Eugenio Zanetti's grand production design, Karl Walter
Lindenlaub's cinematography, and the jarring, loud score from Jerry
Goldsmith.
But De Bont and co have spent too much time on the visual
style of the film and not enough on creating characters that we care
about.  The tired performances from the solid cast seem to reflect the
overall lack of credibility.

Author
Mark Shaw
I admit I was prepared to dislike this movie, being a BIG fan of the
original 1963 version, (which, along with THE INNOCENTS and Nigel
Kneale's THE WOMAN IN BLACK, is one of the best "ghost" films ever made)
and make no mistake, this is a BAD film--a mangled mess that uses
elements from not only the Wise version and other sources, and
completely ignores the original novel--but strangely enough, I can
hardly wait to see it again.  It was hilarious--and after getting over
the disappointment that it wasn't going to be good, (it's REAL obvious
early on) this is the most fun I've had at the movies in a long time. 
It's a carnival ride, the Disneyland Haunted-House times 10, and if
you're familiar with the glories of Robert Wise's original masterpiece,
this movie is going to have you laughing like a hyena at the
jaw-droppingly audacious deviations and liberties taken here, and that
are asked to be taken seriously.   This film is perhaps the ultimate
parody--a skewed, big-budget comedy that's too dim to realize it's
funny--making the laughs (at the hilarious expense of its makers) all
the more hysterical.  It is truly a disaster of biblical, Ed-Woodian
magnitude-- and perhaps the most entertaining film out there this
summer.  
Okay, I know this movie had to appeal to a 90's audience, and I was well
aware it would have a more heavy-handed approach than the Robert Wise
version, (definitely still "the good version") but that doesn't begin to
describe the wayward path this film traipses down.  To say there are
literal ghosts in THE HAUNTING is a maximum understatement; the ghosts
here are more or less the equivelent of DeBont's climactic tornado in
TWISTER; they're big, they're loud, and they fling debris.  In fact,
there are several interesting parallels to TWISTER here, another being
that the team assembled to beard Hill House is similar to the neurotic
band of tornado-chasers, who ultimately confront and experience the
big-villain, cyclone-ghost of Hugh Crane, (manifesting itself
hilariously-- looking here about as  frightening as "The Beast" from the
animated Disney "Beauty & the Beast.")
Somewhere around 20 minutes into the film, you realize it's not going to
be good.  Another 10 minutes, and you give up hoping for coherence.  By
the time the ghosts start manifesting, you're well-aware the filmmakers
have floundered and there's no hope of rescue.  But it doesn't
matter--one thing this movie never is, is boring.  Hill House literally
tears itself apart to get at its pesky investigators, and the whole
thing degenerates into chaos, as bedrooms develop faces, woodwork hands
flail from the moulding, and cherubic marble children's heads gasp and
scream their ghostly little lungs out.  The effects are, as expected,
amazing and impressive, but since they're so in-your-face, it's hard not
to be totally aware of the filmmakers desperate realization that unless
they could make this an effects-extravaganza, how would they ever
compete with THE PHANTOM  MENACE (just next door?!)   Typical of the
summer blockbuster mentality whose sole purpose for being is that they
dazzle us visually, THE HAUNTING  makes no attempt to be suggestive or
scary--and it settles for a totally new, laughable "origin" of Hill
House's haunting.  
In the novel (and Wise's original film) the psychological background of
Eleanor, her neurosis, and vulnerability, become the basis for all the
ghostly phenomena--making the film and novel function on several levels,
and creating a sense of doubt in the viewer's (reader's) mind;  Is Hill
House really haunted with literal ghosts--?  Or is Eleanor making these
things happen herself, unknowingly using the house to project her
phobias and insecurities into visible and audible phenomena?  Since
she's obviously a powerful medium, (it's suggested she was responsible
for a childhood poltergeist attack) Eleanor is the most likely candidate
for being the unwitting culprit that actually "haunts" the
house--regardless of the "evil history" of the place.  This is suggested
with some subtlety in Wise's film.  In DeBont's, it appears this was
considered, as some initial attempts to delineate Nell's character
follow the original's set up, (the "mother banging on the wall" is
suggested early on) but after arriving at the house, this all becomes
immaterial and falls by the wayside in favor of a new "explanation" of
Nell's connection to the house; an extremely trite, ridiculously
unbelievable one that makes all the subtleties concrete, and turns THE
HAUNTING completely away from a psychological study, and into the
lamest, most literal (and clunkingly unscary) ghost story ever.  
I admit, you shouldn't compare a remake to the original in cases like
this, but even as its own monster, this new version fails to work on any
level approaching coherency.  If they're going to create a totally new
story, why bother establishing a set up that suggests the old one?  If
the ghosts are literal, why attempt to make Nell neurotic and vulnerable
in the first place?  In fact, this version seems to be more a remake,
not of THE HAUNTING--but of Richard Matheson's HELL HOUSE--right down to
the (unintentionally funny) shouting-match confrontation with the main
ghost at the end.  This is one howlingly dumb movie.
Still, there's a lot to admire here.  The sets (omigod--the SETS!) are
some of the most baroquely impressive I've ever seen--Hill House is so
crammed-to-the-gills with statuary, stone lions, cherubs, and ponderous
bric-a-brac that it would be impossible to sleep in one of the palatial,
overly-ornate rooms for all the overstimulation of visual input.  In
fact, the house is much scarier in the initial scenes before anything
overtly ghostly takes place, as the sets are so overwhelmingly heavy
with gloomy portent, you almost convince yourself you see statuary and
marble faces move before they actually do (later).  Bruce Dern has a
cameo as Dudley the caretaker, and he's fun (he and his screen-wife get
the film's last word), as is the actress playing Mrs. Dudley (a nice
touch is her "In the night... in the dark," monologue, lifted virtually
verbatum from the original film--and played for the film's one
successful, intentional laugh).  
Lili Taylor is surprisingly weak here, becoming an irritating, whiny
presence in quick order--and playing Nell as overtly (and goofily) nutty
in some scenes when they don't really call for that approach.  Liam
Neeson is nearly forgotten, his character being peripheral in all
respects once the film gets going.  Jones is a bright spot as Theo, but
her bisexual character never attempts the tension of Clair Bloom's
performance in the original--and she's just so gosh-wow CHEERFUL!  Then
there's the actor playing Luke Sannerson (can't remember his name) who
reminds me of Trey Parker, creator of SOUTH PARK.  Weirdly, he becomes
the most  likable character in THE HAUNTING--someone the audience can
identify with and laugh at, as he reacts to the spooky
surroundings--until he abruptly meets his end in one of the films most
outlandishly retarded deviations--a scene that brought gales of laughter
from the crowd.
As a serious film, THE HAUNTING fails spectacularly in any of its
ambitions.  As a remake, it can't hold a candle.  As an adaptation of
the novel, it's obvious no one associated with this movie even read it. 
As an original "haunted house" story, it fails to fulfil, or remain
coherent to, its own set up.  But it may just be the comedy hit of the
summer--the audience we saw it with was hooting and howling with
derisive laughter throughout--and I enjoyed the hell out of it. 
Therefore, I give this film an entertainment rating of 10--as one of the
most unintentionally hilarious films I've ever seen.  Psychotronically,
it stands with the musical remake of LOST HORIZON as a paragon of the
"golden turkey"--one of those special "bad" films we love to
hate--because it's so flagrently, deliciously rotten.  

Author
Marty Mapes
**1/2 (out of 4) I wouldn't have expected Jan De Bont (SPEED, TWISTER)
to make a movie about ghosts. But if he had to make one, it would
probably be the biggest, loudest, most special effects- laden ghost
movie ever.
THE HAUNTING is the second film to be made from Shirley Jackson's book,
"The Haunting of Hill House." The 1963 version, directed by Robert Wise,
is a surprisingly scary movie for its time (or for any time, for that
matter). A well-written script and impeccable direction brought the
audience under its spell, little by little. 
This year's version is not quite as good. It lacks the finesse of the
original. Nevertheless, some of the chills are still there. After a
melodramatically lousy introduction, Dr. Marrow (Liam Neeson) brings a
small group of patients to a remote hideaway, ostensibly for a study on
insomnia. In fact, his insomniacs are subjects in a study on fear. The
doctor hopes to observe the spread of fear from person to person, and
among the group.
Nell (Lili Taylor) is the first to arrive. Her mother has just died
after 11 years of infirmity that required Nell's constant attention.
Theo (Catherine Zeta-Jones) is a strong, solid woman who feels energized
by her insomnia. Luke (Owen Wilson) is a good-natured, rational fellow
who relishes being the only male patient.
Dr. Marrow sets things in motion by telling his subjects about the man
who built the house, how he wanted children of his own, and how each
time his wife got pregnant, the infant died at birth. To really give the
house a haunted feeling, he tells them how the couple finally died of a
murder/suicide.
Like De Bont's other movies, this one is both good and bad. Both SPEED
and TWISTER were excellent IDEAS for movies, and the special effects
sequences were great. But both had sub-par plot and dialogue. Likewise,
THE HAUNTING has some good ideas and some great execution, but pieces of
bad writing taint it somewhat.
I already mentioned the melodramatic sequence at the beginning. The
other bad writing comes early too. Dr. Marrow is "arguing" with a
colleague about his study on fear. The "argument" is actually the
movie's exposition, crammed into about 3 or 4 lines of dialogue. It is
written so obtusely that even Liam Neeson couldn't make it sound good.
Also, Marrow's character is badly researched and poorly thought out. His
study on fear is completely unethical. No self-respecting, licensed
psychologist would deliberately terrorize his subjects just to see how
they react. Sure, those studies have been done in the past, but they
have been all but banned by the profession.
Later, Marrow says that natural responses to fear are detrimental to
coping with situations which cause fear. On the surface, that may appear
to be true, especially in modern man, but an expert in the field of
"fear psychology" (or animal behavior, or anthropology, etc.) should
know better.
But once the movie gets underway, the house takes center stage, and
nitpicks about bad writing drop away. The house is a huge, beautiful,
gothic-looking thing. Every wall, floor, and ceiling is filled with rich
texture. Sculptures, engravings, bas-reliefs, and mosaics fill every
frame, and promise a rich playground for sprites and spirits.
The detail of the furnishings is impressive, but so is the sheer size of
the place, as captured on film by cinematographer Caleb Deschanel (who
recently shot the verdant FLY AWAY HOME). Figures are dwarfed by
gigantic walls and huge, open rooms. Great paintings look down on the
mortals scuttling about underfoot. The walk-in fireplace could consume a
forest of trees. (The combination of huge scale, rich detail, and
ominous mood reminded me of the best traits of computer games like Myst,
Riven, and 7th Guest.)
Clearly the overall mood was successful, thanks largely to Deschanel,
production designer Eugenio Zanetti (who designed the look for WHAT
DREAMS MAY COME), and set designer Cosmas Demetriou. But the big
question is: was it scary?
I think the 1963 version was scarier. For one thing, it never showed you
any apparitions. The unseen, unexplained phenomena were terrifying. (THE
BLAIR WITCH PROJECT handles this very well, too.) You can't show a ghost
without making people think, at least in some small corner of their
mind, about how the image was created. When you start explaining what
the ghost is, or what it looks like, you move into a different area of
horror movies altogether. Compared to the original movie, this one
shows, and explains, far too much.
But that's not to say this movie isn't scary. There are scenes of
unseen, patient terrors; invigorating, only-caught-a-glimpse scares; and
some big frights with huge, loud noises and shaking, rumbling, bass. The
horror wasn't 100% successful because some of the frights were a little
too obvious. But when that was the case, De Bont and editor Michael Kahn
moved on, quickly and without comment, leaving just the good stuff in
the fore of your memory.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.moviehabit.com

Author
Michael Dequina
_The_Haunting_ (PG-13) * (out of ****)
        I never thought I'd see the day when Lili Taylor would carry a
big-budget, big studio summer blockbuster wannabe.  But here she is, the
indie queen herself, playing the lead in $80-million-plus _The_Haunting_.
 One could be led to believe that Taylor's surprising involvement would
indicate a popcorn film that manages to blend the best of the worlds of
art and commerce.  Alas, this all-flash, no-substance--and no
_scare_--thriller is a textbook example of the soulless, money-burning
Hollywood hype products she had so valiantly rebelled against throughout
her entire career.  Hope you enjoyed cashing that paycheck, Miss Taylor.
        I suppose I could see why _The_Haunting_ attracted the attention of
talent such as Taylor and co-stars Liam Neeson and Catherine Zeta-Jones. 
It's an adaptation of Shirley Jackson's novel
_The_Haunting_of_Hill_House_, which had been memorably adapted to screen,
also under the title _The_Haunting_, by Robert Wise in 1963.  Also, the
man at the helm is Jan DeBont, who made his directorial debut with one of
the best and most exciting action thrillers of the decade, 1994's
_Speed_.
        However, _The_Haunting_ continues a disturbing trend that has been
evidenced in DeBont's work since _Speed_: an emphasis on effects and
pyrotechnics over story.  He was able to get by with this approach on the
utterly-brainless-but-fun _Twister_, but it did not serve him well on the
misbegotten _Speed_2:_Cruise_Control_ and is certainly the case here. 
Granted, the storyline of _The_Haunting_ does play like a countdown to
the inevitable grand effects sequences.  Eleanor (Taylor), Theo
(Zeta-Jones), and Luke (Owen Wilson) agree to stay in the large, isolated
old New England mansion named Hill House for an insomnia study conducted
by psychologist Dr. David Marrow (Neeson).  Dr. Marrow, of course, has a
hidden agenda--it is not insomnia but fear he is interested in, and the
creaky, creepy Hill House provides the perfect venue.  But he and his
three test subjects--especially the frightened but fascinated
Eleanor--get more than they bargained for when things do more than go
bump in the night.
        This is when the special effects kick in and the film should kick into
gear.  The physical effects of the living sets, the digital effects used
for the various ghosts, and the sound effects that lends every bump its
boom are of the highest technical order.  But all the polish can't gloss
over one cold, hard fact: none of what the effects bring to life is the
slightest bit scary.  The eye candy is especially enticing, but audiences
are more likely to be in awe of their visual splendor than scream in
fright.  With no jolts nor a sense of a haunting atmosphere, the lapses
in logic in rookie screenwriter David Self's hole-ridden script are made
all the more clear.
        As safe as this trip in a haunted house is, there was one moment during
_The_Haunting_ where many the screening audience did jump in their seats
(some even screamed).  Did it have anything to do with one of those
digital phantoms?  No.  The "living" set design?  No.  What caught
viewers so off guard was... a basic prop skeleton, no more special than
any one you can see in a typical B-movie.  Isn't it nice to know that
these big Hollywood budgets are being used so effectively?
Michael Dequina
twotrey@juno.com | michael_jordan@geocities.com |
jordan_host@sportsmail.com | mrbrown@iname.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site:  http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline:  http://www.HollywoodHotline.com
on ICQ: #25289934  |  on AOL Instant Messenger: MrBrown23


Author
David Sunga
Written by: David Self, based on the classic Shirley Jackson novel
Starring: Lili Taylor, Liam Neeson, Zeta-Jones, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Owen
Wilson
Synopsis: 
Three people sign up to participate in an insomnia study for 900 bucks a
month: Eleanor (Lili Taylor), Theo (Catherine Zeta-Jones), and Luke (Owen
Wilson). Little do they know, their kindly host Dr. Marrow (Liam Neeson)
isn't doing an insomnia study; he's doing a secret study on fear. Soon
enough the three subjects find themselves padlocked in a creepy old mansion
once owned by a demented industrial tycoon. 
Opinion:
The movie takes a while to get started. Nothing really exciting happens in
the first half. In the second half, the special effects take over, with the
haunted mansion doing a lot of morphing. These are great effects, but they
can't make up for plot holes you can drive a truck through. Like, how come
everyone keeps falling asleep if they're supposed to be insomniacs, and
they're in the scariest place on earth? Accompanying a suicidal friend,
what normal person would leave the hysterical friend in a dark, closed,
frightening, haunted room in order to get a cup of tea? Also shouldn't they
give Eleanor's great grandmother a name? Great effects, but what about the
story? 
Copyright  1999 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
Christopher Null
     Some houses should never be visited.  And some movies should never
be remade.  THE HAUNTING represents both of those tenets.
     A loose remake of the 1963 HAUNTING, this version gives us a creepy
haunted house and four hapless people to populate it.  Chief among them
is Eleanor (Taylor), a real wacko who believes there are children's
spirits in the house that speak to her.  And she's right!  Wow,
original!  And hey kids, the sexy Zeta-Jones plays a *bisexual* in the
movie!  Oooooh, scandalous!  (Sarcasm, people.)
     So how does Jan de Bont, made famous as director of SPEED but
best-known as the director of SPEED 2: CRUISE CONTROL, get to make a
horror film?  He was probably the only sucker in Hollywood desperate
enough to take a dog of a film like this.  The fact that he's never done
a horror flick just compounds the problems.
     As a result, THE HAUNTING is not scary -- at all.  Instead it's
just a conglomeration of cheap fright tactics and a booming bass track
meant to get you to jump out of your seat.  Which doesn't work.
     THE HAUNTING also features such a dumb story line and such bad
dialogue it's almost pathetic.  For a horror film to be frequently
*boring* is unforgivable.  And I wager that anyone who bothers to spend
money on this lemon won't be able to forgive themselves either.
     A really cool set (that ultimately serves no purpose) is the only
shining spot in the film.  Otherwise, feel free to skip this one.
Director: Jan de Bont
Producer: Susan Arnold, Donna Arkoff Roth, Colin Wilson
Writer: David Self
Starring: Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Owen Wilson, Lili Taylor,
Bruce Dern
http://www.asylum.com/movies/h/haunting/
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Author
James Sanford
     If you've been wondering what could have prompted that recent
declaration from Liam Neeson that he's ready to give up movies
altogether, the answer is now playing at a cineplex near you. It's
called "The Haunting," and it's so thoroughly misguided and muddled
Dreamworks, the studio foisting this bomb on the public, ought to hire a
special corps of ushers to hand out sympathy cards to patrons as they
exit the theater.
This is the second time Hollywood has tackled Shirley Jackson's
book "The Haunting of Hill House." It was previously filmed by director
Robert Wise in 1963 -- that version was also titled "The Haunting" --
with Julie Harris, Claire Bloom and Richard Johnson. The 1963 "Haunting"
remains one of the eeriest ghost stories ever filmed; though Wise never
showed a single spirit, he and his cast created such an overpowering
atmosphere of menace the movie is still potent today.
The current "Haunting" comes from director Jan de Bont ("Twister,"
"Speed"), who is better known as a master of disaster and an
orchestrator of special effects than as a craftsman capable of creating
a mood piece. Thus, this version is chock-full of computer-generated
ghouls and bone-shaking digital stereo cacophony, none of which makes
the movie in any way frightening or even particularly interesting.
The difference between the two "Haunting"s is literally spelled
out. In the Wise film, a creepy message is found scrawled across a wall
in chalk. In de Bont's film, a similiar sentiment is painted in blood.
Everything in this "Haunting" is louder, more elaborate and far sillier
than anything in the original.
David Self's choppy screenplay introduces Dr. Marrow (Neeson) who
has recruited a trio of subjects for a little experiment in terror,
scheduled to take place in Hill House, a cavernous estate full of dark
secrets. Eleanor (Lili Taylor) has spent a large portion of her life
waiting on her invalid mother; Theo (Catherine Zeta Jones) is a
free-loving jet-setter; Luke (Owen Wilson) is basically just horny. The
only thing these three have in common is insomnia, and they've been
lured to Dr. Marrow by the promise of big bucks for participating in a
research study.
But Dr. Marrow is more concerned with observing the mechanics of
fear than in finding a cure for sleeplessness, and certainly no one gets
much shut-eye when the unseen inhabitants of Hill House begin treating
their guests to a series of bizarre visions and increasingly violent
bursts of mayhem.
The story's original subtext -- that most of the calamity was
springing from the virginal Eleanor's long-repressed libido -- vanishes
under Self's heavy hand. In the 1963 film, Harris' Eleanor was torn
between returning the affections of Bloom's Theo, who was openly
lesbian, and Johnson's Dr. Markway. Here, Self introduces Theo as a
bisexual, only to promptly drop the matter altogether; hard to believe
filmmakers could be more frank about sexuality 36 years ago than they
can be today.
But this "Haunting" isn't about people anyway. It's about
technology. But despite the millions that must have been spent on the
various creations the fact remains that they simply aren't scary. In
some cases, they're even ludicrous: When a chorus of carved cherubs
comes screamingly to life, it's hard not to think of the Pop N Fresh
doughboy being threatened with a trip to the oven.
What's more disturbing is the amateurishness of the performances,
given the reputations of those involved. Neeson and Jones seem
completely uninspired, Wilson is just plain awful and the ordinarily
wonderful Taylor proves here that she can't scream convincingly to save
her life. While she barely manages to retain her dignity in scenes that
call for her to have conversations with curtains, even Taylor can't rise
above a ridiculous climactic speech full of pop psychology and jibberish
about family values.
Yes, Mr. Neeson, you're right. "The Haunting" is awful enough to
make anyone reconsider their career choice. Especially film critics.

Author
Eugene Novikov
"No one lives any nearer than town. No one will come any nearer than
that. In the night. In the dark."
Starring Lili Taylor, Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Luke Wilson.
Rated PG-13 (but I'd have given it an R).
The Haunting is a terrific thriller: scary, great-looking and
satisfying; it's a shame to see that many of my colleagues dislike it so
intensely. It may be a triumph of style over substance, but what a
triumph! -- with eye-popping set design, convincing special effects and
a surprisingly tense atmosphere, this is not only a strong contender for
a Best Visual Effects Oscar but also a damn good movie in its own right;
a not-so-guilty pleasure.
The film opens with surprisingly effective character introduction. We
see Eleanor "Nel" Lance (Lili Taylor, whom I mistook for Jamie Lee
Curtis) in a family crisis: her mother, whom she has selflessly taken
care of for nearly her whole life has just died, and her sister (the
executor of the estate) threatens to sell their mother's house, which
Nel is living in. The sister offers Nel an opportunity to go live with
her as a housekeeper/nanny, to which Nel responds by ordering her and
her husband to "get out of [her] home." Immediately following the
incident, she gets a mysterious phone call telling her to look at an ad
in the newspaper for an insomnia study which offers room and board and
pays $900 a week.
She volunteers for the experiment and arrives at "Hill House", a
gigantic old mansion where Dr. Jeffrey Marrow (Liam Neeson) has gathered
three subjects for a study of his, but it's not what they think. An
insomnia study it ain't; what it is, in effect, is an experiment to
discover the nature of fear. He keeps this fact secret from his human
guinea pigs because "you don't tell the rats they're actually in a
maze." He wants to use the creepy mansion to create a suggestive
environment so he can study the dynamics of fear. He slowly reveals the
frightening history of the house (sweatshops, suicides, all kinds of
scary stuff) and has the three insomniacs fill in the blanks to create a
self-inflicted nightmare.
The three "rats" are Nel; Theo (Catherine Zeta-Jones), a frisky
bisexual; and Luke (Wilson), a hyperactive towhead. As the house (or
whoever is haunting it) toys with Nel, the others begin to think she has
gone crazy and needs supervision. Nel, meanwhile, begins to think that
she was brought to that house for a greater purpose and is determined to
find out her identity as well as the identities of those who lived in
the house.
Director Jan de Bont, who proved that he was a talented action director
with Speed before faltering with flops like Speed 2 and Twister,
provides for a terrific ride with this no-holds-barred suspenser (so
much so, in fact, that the film should have received an R rating of a
PG-13, if only because of the scene where a guy gets his head knocked
off). There are plenty of standard "boo" moments, some of which work
rather well, while spectacular effects enhance other already suspenseful
scenes.
As photographed by Caleb Deschanel, The Haunting looks terrific. The
house itself is so richly defined that it becomes a veritable character
in the movie. Brilliant camerawork only adds to that effect. With
sweeping camera zooms, lush and vibrant colors, incredible set design
and wonderful effects, even if you hate the movie itself you can still
sit back and enjoy looking at it.
The performances seem irrelevant, but they serve their purpose; Wilson,
Taylor and Zeta-Jones scream and panic very well. Only Liam Neeson fails
to be believable: when he got really really mad at one point, I burst
out laughing. An added bonus: the always delightful Marian Seldes (Home
Alone 3, Affliction) as the creepy housekeeper.
I don't tend to warm up to outright special effects extravaganzas, but
The Haunting worked for me, partly because the story was well thought
out, especially compared to most other big budget blockbusters, partly
because it contained many entertainingly intense scenes and partly
because it was so much fun to look at. I liked this movie and I don't
feel the least bit guilty.
1999 Eugene Novikov
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
The Haunting (1999)
Lili Taylor, Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Owen Wilson. Music by 
Jerry Goldsmith. Screenplay by David Self, based on the novel "The 
Haunting of Hill House" by Shirley Jackson. Produced by Susan Arnold, 
Donna Roth and Colin Wilson. Directed by Jan De Bont. 112 minutes.
PG-13, 1.5 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to 
pbbp24a@prodigy.com
If "The Haunting" was trimmed down to 40 minutes and presented in 3-D as 
an IMAX feature, it might serve as a passable diversion. In its present 
form, the production is merely a flat, draggy exercise in cheesy special 
effects and grandiose art direction palming itself off as a horror movie. 
"The Haunting" is not scary, not in the least. Although technically an 
adaptation of Shirley Jackson's novel, "The Haunting of Hill House," the 
plot of the film is almost as insubstantial as the spirits within it. In 
fact, the whole thing plays far more like an amusement park spook-house 
ride than a real movie. The producers would be better served by cutting a 
deal with Disney World, installing a tram on the sets and billing the 
whole thing as "The Haunted Mansion: Version 2.0."
"The Haunting" is just another sad example of the "more-is-better" school 
of filmmaking, with Jan "Oh my God, it's the guy who directed 'Speed 2!'" 
De Bont at the helm. While wasting 112 precious, irreplaceable minutes of 
my life on this leaden dud, I repeatedly thought of "The Blair Witch 
Project," a genuinely creepy, disquieting film produced for less money 
than "The Haunting" spent on catered lunches for the crew. Didn't anyone 
at Dreamworks notice that their $80 million horror show wasn't the 
slightest bit horrifying? Apparently not, for while the studio did sent 
De Bont back for some last minute reshoots, it was only to "clarify the 
ending." 
The film starts off in standard haunted-house movie fashion, introducing 
the characters and giving viewers a tour of Spook Central. Liam Neeson 
plays a doctor who lures three subjects to a massive, gothic mansion in 
New England, under the pretense of conducting a study of sleep disorders. 
Actually, he is researching the "primordial fear reaction" and intends to 
plant disturbing ideas in his subjects and watch what happens. The 
nitwits who believe that a sleep study would be conducted in a mammoth, 
isolated house are Eleanor (Lili Taylor), a mousy caregiver; Theodora 
(Catherine Zeta Jones), an extremely self-assured bisexual; and Luke 
(Owen Wilson), a wise-cracking slacker. 
But forget the characters (De Bont certainly did), for the real star is 
the house itself, an absurdly huge estate packed with gigantic creaking 
doors, cavernous hallways, wildly ornate chambers (including a mirrored 
carousel room), and loads of cherub carvings, gargoyles and other weird 
knickknacks. The sets are impressive, but never for a moment do they seem 
like anything but over-the-top eye candy. 
There lies the problem with the whole movie. Nothing feels the least bit 
convincing, from the idiotic premise to the phony-looking house to the 
cornball special effects (try, just try, not to laugh as the wooden 
cherubs' faces morph into "Oh no!" expressions worthy of "Mr. Bill"). 
Ghost stories work only if the audience is drawn into the tale, and De 
Bont has no clue how to accomplish that. Instead of vicariously 
experiencing terror in a haunted house, we remain bored spectators, 
watching talented actors swallowed by De Bont's blustery spook-tacular. 
"The Haunting" promises thrills and chills, but delivers only yawns. What 
a colossal drag.

Author
Stephen Graham Jones
What gets you in a haunted house movie are the quiet moments, when you
expect something to happen. A good haunted house movie incubates this,
stacks up a few false positives, then knocks them down all at once in a
crash of cymbals, only to start the whole process over. Think The Shining,
Amityville, even Poltergeist. Jan de Bont's The Haunting, a liberal remake
of the 1962 Haunting of Hill House, based on the Shirley Jackson novel,
doesn't so much concern itself with this second stage--remounting the
tension. Instead it jacks it up and keeps it there, until the baseline (the
quiet moments) are the moments when only some of the faces on the wall are
tracking a character's progress across a room, down a hall, through one of
the countless thirty-foot tall doors of Hill House. This isn't to say there
isn't escalation, though. More like overload. The place is an absolute
amusement park of horror, the ideal setting for Dr. Marrow (Liam Neeson) to
stage an experiment on fear; he wants to know what use sweaty palms, rapid
heartbeats, pupil dilation and all that have in today's world. His idea is
that they're vestigial responses, of no use anymore. How observing a handful
of insomniacs is supposed to answer his question is a bit murky, though,
which is just as well, as the sweaty palms etc are never given a chance to
redeem themselves. So it goes.
Suffice it to say that the three subjects--homebody Eleanor (Lily Taylor),
bisexual party gal Theo (Catherine-Zeta-Jones), and sardonic Owen (the
intractable Luke Wilson)--walk the halls all night trying to get to the
bottom of the many strange goings-on. Voices, cherubic faces in the
curtains, interdimensional gongs, the whole gamut. And of course no two of
them ever see the same phenomenon simultaneously, which isn't so much a
trick of camerawork as an accepted convention. Where The Haunting departs
from tradition, however, is in the noticeable absence of sexual tension.
Nevermind that Catherine Zeta-Jones is splashed all over the trailer, still
in supermodel shape from Zorro and Entrapment. She's evidently just window
dressing. The one or two token innuendoes (invitations?) her Theo directs
Eleanor's way hardly even register, perhaps because Eleanor--suddenly the
central character--has other things to worry about. Like distinguishing the
scary but good ghosts from the scary and bad ghosts, and how she may or may
not fit into the history of Hill House.
About this scary and bad ghost: aside from being a Scrooge lookalike, he
seems more intent upon frightening Eleanor & Co. to death than upon actually
killing them, which--judging by his insanity level and the power he
wields--would be a short night's work. But then we wouldn't get startled,
right? And The Haunting does startle, something of a feat in itself, taking
into account a slightly jaded audience. It does this by not allowing us to
anticipate the narrative, and it does that by more or less replacing the
narrative with special effects. The same ones introduced with The
Frighteners and abused in The Mummy, both of which fell similarly short on
story but spent a lot of money doing so. Like them, The Haunting is best
seen in the theater, where you can be wowed by sound and lights and not have
time to consider what might be missing.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Author
Dennis Schwartz

HAUNTING, THE (director: Jan de Bont; screenwriter: David Self, based on
the novel The Haunting of Hill House by Shirley Jackson;
cinematographer: Caleb Deschanel; editor: Michael Kahn; cast: Lili
Taylor (Nell), Liam Neeson (Dr. David Marrow), Catherine Zeta Jones
(Theo), Owen Wilson (Luke), Alix Koromzay (Mary), Marian Seldes (Mrs.
Dudley), Bruce Dern (Mr. Dudley); Runtime:112; 1999)
This one's a bomb. It's a total special effect film, sapping away what
is human about the characters, while unsuccessfully putting the human
characteristics into the haunted house.  The house is the star of the
film and the actors are the props. This insipid horror story has little
to recommend it; it wasn't scary, or campy, or well acted, it was just
unimaginative. The few thrills it offers, are all a result of special
effects. This is a date film more than anything else.
The real horror it provided, was zapping Shirley Jackson's very literate
psychological thriller. A far better film version, one that was actually
thrilling, is the one done in 1963 by Robert Wise. The director of this
film, Jan de Bont (Speed/Speed 2/ Twister), is not up to dealing with a
psychological story and directing characters in a persuasive way, he is
more into making silly theme movies that rely solely on special effects.
The man just can't make a literate film.
A research test for volunteer insomniacs is advertised in the paper, as
a psychologist, Dr, Marrow (Liam), is using that as a cover for his
study of group fear. Unhappy with her lot in life, Nell (Taylor), a
repressed and timid spinster who took care of her invalid mother until
she recently died, finds out that her mother didn't even leave her the
apartment. She seems relieved to get away from her unpleasant situation
and do the experiment, and welcomes the chance to be living with other
volunteers, even if they will live in the scary Hill House.
Theo (Zeta) is an extrovert, an attractive NYC artist, an insomniac who
is bi-sexual, favoring lesbian relationships, causing her to have
problems with her boyfriend and wanting to change her scene for awhile.
Luke (Owen) is an insomniac, with a hyper personality and manic energy,
who will comically walk around the schlock house among the griffins and
huge hallways in his pajama bottoms and a baseball glove. Soon they will
all experience strange phenomena, such as Nell's name written on the
wall welcoming her home and telling her to leave or else, a moving
flume, house breathing sounds, animated ghosts of murdered children and
the ghost of the ogre who built the house, and one dramatic shot of the
ogre's wife who committed suicide, as she is seen suspended from the
ceiling by a rope around her neck. This house is haunted Hollywood
style, as the Gothic house, which Theo describes as a cross between
something Charles Foster Kane would build and the Munsters' house,
becomes the central focus of the film and the insomniacs stay away
trying to look afraid of what they are seeing. It's all hokum from
beginning to end, and it is so poorly scripted, that tedium quickly sets
in, leaving the film with no purpose except to be laughed at for how
stupid it all is.
Since this thriller was never thrilling, it just went on to show off the
stage set designs illustriously created by Eugenio Zanetti, all one
could do was go from room to room and stare at the cherubs, the leaping
skeletons, the elaborately built stairway collapsing, an animated hand
of a ghost coming out of the fountain, and at the futile effort to make
a Disney fantasy picture. The film concludes on a bland note, not even
bothering to go after what the Liam character was supposed to be about,
whether he was an egotistical scientist out for his own ends or a good
guy trying to help science with useful knowledge. After the film
exhausts itself with its fake horror show and we see the ghost of Hill
house chasing after Nell, the film gets a few laughs it never intended
to get, as it concludes as a show-off will, when he is so proud of his
wealthy house, that he thinks he has really impressed you, and continues
to show-and-tell long after one has lost interest. The laughs that were
gleaned, are of the kind that do not bode well for the film, they are
the laughs that come from those who know they have just seen a bad film.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
 ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring Liam Neeson; Catherine Zeta-Jones; Owen Wilson; Lili Taylor & Bruce
Dern
When The Haunting arrived in theaters, all I kept hearing about was the
overdone special effects and the fact that very often the unseen bumps in
the night in a horror film are far scarier than those that you can put a
face to courtesy of special effects. While I agree that this remake of The
Haunting goes a bit overboard in the visual effects department, I don't
think that they are completely to blame for this movie's failure. It appears
that some people have failed to take into account that the original Haunting
had the "unseen" terrors, and it was about as scary as a dust bunny. So
special effects or not, if the story isn't the least bit scary, you aren't
going to end up with a very frightening movie. The thing that interested me
most about this movie was the caretaker of this building played by Bruce
Dern. Dern is always great, and even though he may have had only about 3
minutes of screen time he was still the most interesting element of the
movie. As I sat through the seemingly endless, albeit fairly impressive,
special effects, I kept wishing that this movie was about Dern's caretaker
and not the one dimensional characters that populated the cast. Never a good
sign when a bit player is the best part of the movie.
Liam Neeson plays a scientist who is conducting experiments on fear. He
decides the best way to get results is to trick a group of fairly unstable
individuals to spend a few days in a haunted mansion. He tricks them into
participating by letting on that he is conducting an experiment on insomnia.
And he also fails to mention that the mansion has a reputation for strange
goings-on. Catherine Zeta-Jones, Lili Taylor and Owen Wilson play his
subjects. Like the original, Taylor's character is the star of the movie.
But since she doesn't quite have the marquee power of Liam Neeson and Ms.
Zeta-Jones, their parts did seem to be a big larger than in the original.
And let's face it, probably half the people who see this movie will do so
because of Zeta-Jones. I'll admit that I would have never seen this thing if
she weren't in it.
But the real stars here is the special effects combined with the fairly
overdone sets. They take over the movie as the supernatural elements of the
house start to interact with our hapless insomnia patients. There really
isn't much of a story here. Just endless setups so director Jan de Bont can
showcase all the nifty special effects that he got to play with. And the
special effects are great. In many cases they are as good as you are likely
to see anywhere. In other cases they are overdone and obviously thrown in
just for the sake of hitting the "cool shots" quota. At no point in the
movie do any of these things ever come close to being scary -- funny, maybe.
But not scary. Then we have the set. When I first saw the house, I was very
impressed with the very cool gothic look about it. But it only took a short
tour by the characters around the place to see that the set designers
obviously had as much money to burn as the visual effects people did, and
decided to take the idiotically overdone route. This included a flooded
hallway with books as stepping stones and a mirrored circular room that
revolves. What part did these rooms play in the story? Absolutely none. They
were just there to take our minds off the fact that there was neither a
descent story nor a single scare in the entire movie.
Then we have the actors. Lili Taylor has never been one of my favorites. And
when the fact that her character is mousy and pathetic is factored in, she
comes in around the average or slightly below mark. I have no idea why Liam
Neeson took this role. He basically reminded me of the ringmaster at an out
of control circus. His character was in charge of this farce but it quickly
got away from him. I have no doubt that Liam will want to lock all prints of
this movie in a very secure vault along with all copies of Darkman.
Zeta-Jones was cast because she is too hot for words. The fact that her
character is bi-sexual is just icing on the cake. All Catherine has to do in
this movie is look good. Fortunately that is something she does very well.
While she does have a fairly good size part, it is obvious that her only
purpose in the movie was as eye-candy. It's too bad someone of her talents
wasted them here. Any random supermodel pulled out of a fashion show could
have easily filled her role.
The Haunting is the antithesis of another of 1999's horror movies, The Blair
Witch Project. The Haunting had a seemingly limitless effects budget, while
Blair Witch relies on piles of rocks for its scares. Both prove quite nicely
that special effects are irrelevant to a horror film. If the story sucks,
it's all downhill from there. My advice? If you are looking for special
effects, go rent Star Wars. If it's scares you want, rent Halloween. Either
way, it's probably in your best interests to skip The Haunting.

Author
Steve Rhodes
THE HAUNTING stars a large gothic mansion.  With eerie old paintings,
large human-like sculptures and creepy corridors, the house looks
remarkably like Disneyland's Haunted Mansion.  The main difference in
the two edifices is that Disneyland's is comically frightening, whereas
THE HAUNTING's is neither comical nor frightening.
Over-the-top action director Jon de Bont relegates the human stars to
minor roles.  Since all of their performances are embarrassing, this is
perhaps to their advantage.  Ironically, de Bont's claim to fame is
SPEED.  Most of THE HAUNTING appears to be on a quite different drug,
Valium.  The tedium is more likely to bore you to death than scare you
with its expensive special effects.  Only in the outlandish last part
does the pacing pick up.
The plot for the movie, which is a remake, concerns a deceptive
scientist, Dr. Jeffrey Marrow (Liam Neeson), who lures guests to the
house on the pretense of doing sleep research on insomniacs.  Actually,
he's conducting an experiment on the effects of mass hysteria.
The guinea pigs include Theodora (Catherine Zeta-Jones), a glamorous
woman who flaunts her bisexuality for no particular purpose other than
its minimal shock value, Eleanor Lance (Lili Taylor), a sensitive woman
who has spent 11 years caring for her dying mother, and Luke Sannerson
(Owen Wilson), a pretty guy who acts like a spaced-out surfer dude.
As the story slowly advances, the house displays some of its charms.  In
canonical horror movie fashion, doors come alive and spirits move about.
Most of the time, however, the movie relies on lots of low base
rumbling.  These sounds scare the wits out of the cast, but they, of
course, are being paid millions to act afraid.  The effects on audiences
are likely to be profoundly muted.
The movie works only if you can ignore how serious the participants are
taking it and assume it must be a parody.  The problem with this
approach is that it's just not funny.
"This is so twisted, seriously twisted," Theodora says.  No Theodora, it
isn't, and therein lies the problem.  The film is a lame retread of a
hundred other similar horror movies, only the budget is larger.
Maybe de Bont should have attempted something more challenging, say a
shot-for-shot reconstruction of Gus Van Sant's PSYCHO?
THE HAUNTING runs a long 2:05.  It is rated PG-13 for intense horror
sequences and would be acceptabe for kids 12 and up.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Alex Ioshpe

DIRECTED BY: Jan de Bont
WRITTEN BY: David Shelf, based upon a novel by Shirley Jackson
CAST: Liam Neeson, Cathrine Zeta Jones, Lili Taylor, Lili Taylor, Marian Seldes
The tagline for this film is: "Some houses are just born bad". So I didn't expect too much from this. But I had preserved a little spark of ope as I entered the theatre. I thought: Liam Neeson, Cathrine Zeta Jones and Jan De Bont. I thought, mabe it will be fun? And in fact the beginning was rather intriguing. But by the end of it I thought: why Liam Neeson and Cathrine Zeta Jones, Jan De Bont?. These great actors are basically helpless with this muddled mess that defies any rationality. Here is the story: In the monstrously over-decorated mansion known as Hill House, visitors are tricked by an unknown doctor (Liam Neeson) into being guinea pigs in a fright experiment under the guise of an insomnia investigation. Among them is a sophisticated bisexual (Cathrine Zeta Jones), a cynical dope (Owen Wilson) and a gentle and emotional lady (Lily Taylor). Actually, the doctor is researching the "primordial fear reaction" and intends to plant disturbing ideas in his subjects and watch!
 what happens. But he gets unexpected help from the house itself. 
It rumbles, hums and belches forth remarkable sights. Portals become veiny stained-glass eyeballs. A fireplace guarded by stone lions gapes like a sinister mouth. Filmy cherubic spirits take shape under sheets and billowy curtains. But the computerized spooketeria rarely feels real, placing an emotional wall between audience and screen. The second half of the film is basically about the main heroine running back and forth from the sinister lamps and evil furniture. Is that exciting or what? The worst thing about it is that it didn't have to be bad. It's based on a great book, ``The Haunting of Hill House,'' by Shirley Jackson. A 1963 adaptation of the book was scary and intelligent. It played with the greatest fears of our sub conscience. "The Blair Witch Project", that cost less than an old car, managed to shock and terrify the audiences from their senses. And with a $70 mill. budget, De Bont and screenwriter David Self make hash out of a perfectly lovely piece of terror. De !
Bont has a style of filmmaking so out of line with the material that it is, in itself, frightening. He is the master of the extravagant special effect and the big visual adrenaline rush. But why give him a more serious material? In the end "Haunting" will only haunt its fledgling studio (Dream Works SKG) and De Bont's career as a director.
Yet it wouldn't be fair to say that everything is bad. The effects are truly impressive and the house is wonderfully decorated -- beautiful, mysterious, magical and spooky. But this is where the good things end. The music is blaring, the floors moving, the ceiling morphing and the pictures on the walls screaming -- and all of this, every second, every moment of screen time, is absolutely without life. It's nothing more than a special effects-extravaganza; visually impressive, but intellectually hollow thriller that simply doesn't engage. At first you do not know what's going on. Is this part of the experiment? Are these hallucinations? Projections of the subconscience? Paranoia? But in the end it shows out that this is actually happening. The house is actually possessed. It is at that point when all your hopes for a good entertainment disappears out of the window. For ever, I sat in anticipation for a decent climax and that's what I got? I believe Hichock once said that "it's !
better to wait for a climax, than to see one". This may be true, and it might actually work, but there is only one problem -- Jan De Bont is not Hichock and the things that he shows are not scary, only stupid. They are impossible to take seriously. Any paralells that you might have heard before, linking this picture to Kubrick's "The Shining", are absolutely baseless. "Shining" had class, style, story, acting, but most of all talent and originality. "Haunting" has only special effects and art direction to boast of. And those elements alone are not enough to make it a good film. Casting good actors for small, pale parts only makes things worse. But I guess that no matter what I or other critics say or write, most of you will see this film anyway, even if the tagline would say: "Some films are just born stupid". 

Author
Paul Dearing
The Haunting (1999)
Thriller / Suspense / Horror
Lili Taylor, Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Owen Wilson
Directed by Jan De Bont
1 hour, 52 minutes
Rated PG-13 for profanity, a few violent scenes, mature themes, intense
special effects, suggestive dialogue, scares
Wide-screen aspect ratio: 2.35:1
Rating (0 - 100): _42_
*This review contains moderate to major spoilers for "The Haunting"
    Some movies are born bad. This is one of them. "The Haunting" echoes
with the mind-numbing stupidity of your average summer CGI-piloted flick,
brimming with special effects in every nook and cranny, which do their fair
share of overshadowing what's really important here: the story which it
blatantly lacks. The premise is interesting: a psychologist lures three
insomniacs into a deserted, sprawling mansion under the pretense of helping
them achieve a good night's sleep. What he is really doing is setting them
up for a bizarre experiment in the elements of fear, paranoia, and dread.
Dr. Marrow (Liam Neeson, in a silly role that the screenwriter probably
concocted while passing a kidney stone) comes upon Hill House, an immense,
beautiful estate which sits nine miles from any civilization.
And three people come upon Dr. Marrow's ad for the "insomnia research
project," promising handsome pay and a cure for their sleeplessness. The
first to arrive at the spooky mansion is central character Nell (Lili
Taylor, who absolutely shines), a fragile woman grieving over her mother's
death. She meets the creepy caretakers and then meets Theo (Catherine
Zeta-Jones), a bisexual tempest with a love for exotic fashion (she enters
the film in knee-high Prada boots and in later scenes sports sensual evening
wear and a fur coat). Then they both run into (literally) Luke (Owen Wilson
of "Armageddon"), the film's most enjoyable yet wasted character who makes
wisecracks and subtle advances at Theo, and is also the first of the three
to figure out that Dr. Marrow has something up his sleeve.
I have to admit that I liked the way that the picture started out. The
characters are interesting, if underdeveloped, and are played very well.
Early jumpy moments provide oomph for the plot to get going, because it does
take some time before the sleep-deprived trio begin wandering Hill House's
halls and find things that go bump in the night.
But two girls, a guy, and a spooky place is all that it really becomes,
when Nell digs into the house's sinister history and slowly becomes sucked
into its dark past. Hill House, we learn, was built by a man named Crane,
who operated mills and murdered children in his spare time (Nell finds bones
beneath a fireplace as well as a list of the deceased in one of his old
ledgers). From there, it goes downhill - fast. The others think that Nell is
going nuts, which forces Dr. Marrow to reveal the true nature of his
experiment. Gasp. That's what they try to make you do in "The Haunting," but
all you do is laugh - at multiple unintentionally funny moments. The people
in the row behind me cackled to themselves frequently, as did myself, as did
many people in the theater. I wish I could go into these over-the-top
moments, but I can only talk about movies this bad for so long.
Ultimately, Nell thinks that the house "wants her" and that it is full of
the lost souls of the murdered children put to work in Crane's mills. There
are several mentions of purgatory (a state in which a soul exists in neither
heaven nor hell) in the film, suggesting that this is where the souls of the
children (as well as Crane himself) exist. Actually, they're in a really
shitty script, but purgatory is fine too. The movie builds to such a
laughably silly climax that you will suddenly find the texture of your
shoelaces to be strangely interesting.
The evil soul of Mr. Crane is unleased and Nell battles him to both of
their ends, as he is sent to hell and she winds up dead herself. Dr. Marrow
and Theo (Luke was sadly decapitated in an earlier scene by a chimney flue)
look on as her spirit exits her body and begins to the guide the spirits of
the children, emerging from every corner of Hill House, and they all ascend
to heaven. Thus, the film ends. The bottom line is that "The Haunting" is
not a scary movie. Nevermind that it blows, it could at least pack a few
frights, but I only jumped once. An interesting new face in the film is Lili
Taylor, from "I Shot Andy Warhol" and "Ransom." She was also nominated for
an Emmy in a guest role on an X-Files episode. She sloshes through flat
dialogue (her final line in the film may go down as one of the worst uttered
in film history), but she performs the character very well. I hope we will
see more of her. The special effects are first-rate, but I think that in the
case of this movie they are put to bad use. The sets of the film however,
are jaw-dropping. If you are a fan of films that are interesting in concept
but ludicrous in climax, containing good actors and abundant eye-candy, "The
Haunting" may be worth a viewing. But don't get to immersed in it. You might
never want to see a horror film again.

Author
ram@csb.stanford.edu
The Haunting
http://www.ram.org/ramblings/movies/the_haunting.html
/The Haunting/ uses a classic horror plot device: a group of strangers
are trapped in an isolated location and are susceptible to the
supernatural force around them.  They have to get out before it's too
late, but said force keeps them from leaving.
In this particular case, the group of people consist of psychology
professor Dr. Jeffrey Marrow (Liam Neeson) (who allegedly is doing a
study on insomnia but is really looking at the dynamics of fear) and
his experimental subjects who have difficult sleeping: Eleanor Lance
(Lili Taylor), a single young woman who has spent most of her taking
care of her recently deceased mother; Theodora (Catherine Zeta-Jones),
a bisexual; and Luke Sannerson (Owen Wilson).  The location is Hill
House, a mansion belonging to the late Hugh Crane, believed by the
locals to be haunted by the ghosts of the children who died working in
Crane's sweatshop that he ran.  Within the crowd of these motley
dysfunctionals, it is Eleanor who holds the key to unlocking the Hill
House's mysteries and freeing the souls of the trapped children.
The movie is great because there are some comic moments here, some
even intentional.  The unintentional moments arise because of the
cheesiness of the plot and effects.  The movie is scary at times,
particularly at the beginning but peters out the end when the face of
the evil within Hill House is exposed to us deliberately and slowly
(unlike in the 1963 classic and Shirley Jackson's novel). The main
problem is the lack of suspense. Rather than shock us, Director Jan de
Bont (/Speed/, /Twister/) shows us everything: eerie ghosts floating
around, statues coming to life, and the evil that is Hugh Crane, but
all this does is remove the suspense within the story.
The movie tries to be serious by touching upon various intriguing
aspects to the characters' lives, but doesn't linger upon them to do
any character development (for example, it's mentioned that Theodora
is bisexual, but to what end?).  The set is magnificent and the sound
track has its moments.  One particularly scary moment involves Eleanor
sifting through the ashes in the fireplace and being surprised by a
human skull, and one particularly hilarious moment occurs when Luke's
head is taken off (in the same location) and Marrow winces.  The
acting is passable, with Wilson doing an extremely bad job, but
well-suited to generate a few laughs.
/The Haunting/ is a fun movie---it made me laugh out a lot and there
very a few times when I jumped.  It's B-grade entertainment that's
worth that matinee fare.


Author
John Sylva
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe/MoviePED.html
Loosely based on the Shirley Jackson novel The Haunting of Hill House, and the
1963 film The Haunting, The Haunting is the first memorable haunted house flick
since 1979's The Amityville Horror.  The film's trailers appeared to be
sporting a psychological, eerie horror flick, but while The Haunting is eerie,
special effects are overdone, therefore making it impossible for your
imagination to scare you.  Unlike the 1963 adaption of the novel, The Haunting
explains what is happening at almost all times, therefore creating constant
tension, but few scares.  The first adaption never actually explained what was
happening when strange noises or images would pop up, allowing your imagination
to take off and allow fear to be felt.
Nell Vance (Lili Taylor), Theo (Catherine Zeta-Jones), and Luke Sannerson (Owen
Wilson) have all been hand picked by Dr. David Marrow (Liam Neeson) to be
subjects of an insomnia study which will be held at the eerie, gothic, New
England mansion of Hill House, which "sits all alone," after "something bad
happened."  After one night at Hill House, Nell believes it is haunted with
spirits of children, and is targeting her to live in the creepy home.
As the film prepares you for the exciting second half, we view Hill House,
inside and out, making Hill House the real star of the show.  The $10 million
sets are unbelievable, and if it weren't for all the special effects that come
in the film's climax, The Haunting's environment could have served a much
greater purpose.  The screenplay, written by David Self, and the direction of
Jan De Bont (Twister) take their marvelous sets for granted, as the stunning
visual effects are overused, and the house is used as a backdrop for these
events to occur.  Sure we see plenty of Hill House during the guest's arrival,
but the house is never used in a scary way, unlike the 1963 adaption.
The screenplay is particularly weak, as we hardly get to know the characters,
and there are so many scenes with horrifying potential that go down the drain
due to special effects, which should have been watered down about 50%.  I felt
like I was watching 1997's Austin Powers at times, as David Self's screenplay
has what Richard Pryor would call, "The Honky Syndrome." There is an abundance
of plot gaps, including - After Liam Neeson unlocks the gate to Hill House to
let out his injured assistant, he seems to have forgotten later on when he
needs the key, that he actually has it.  Even I could make a screenplay that
makes more sense then that of David Self's, as could anyone else with the
education of a 5th grader.
Nell is the only developed character, as in the film's opening moments, we see
Nell thrown out of her apartment carelessly by her family, leaving her no place
to go, except Hill House.  Nell decides to go to Hill House for the experiment
in which she will be paid $900 a week, hoping the experience will be a standout
from her otherwise ordinary, normal life.  Lili Taylor pulls off the role for
the most part, but come the second half of the film when Nell totally loses it,
not Lili Taylor, nor anyone could pull off some of the actions and lines that
Nell presents.
Catherine Zeta-Jones, who makes her third appearance as the popular actress she
is today, does what she can with the weak character she has, as in the first
half of the film Theo's presence is noticeable, as she delivers line after line
of witty dialogue, but in the second half, the film concentrates only on Nell,
as Theo, along with Liam Neeson's Dr. Marrow and Owen Wilson's Luke become just
a background image.
Liam Neeson, who has come to be one of today's most distinguished actors, after
portraying Jedi Qui Gon-Jinn in Star Wars Episode 1: The Phantom Menace, and
receiving an Oscar nomination for Schindler's List.  In The Haunting, Neeson is
given nothing to do at all, as Dr. Marrow doesn't take action at anytime, and
only listens to the characters as they share their experiences.  Neeson is used
as the doctor to setup the plot, but is used no further, as the special effects
are unleashed.
Although The Haunting suffers major flaws, mainly due to its screenplay, the
film is still extremely enjoyable, and it does call for me to bring up a few
good points.  The Haunting is suspenseful, as the creaks and cracks in the
night are eerie, and the visual effects are amazing, as we see ghosts swim
through bed sheets, and a room literally comes alive.  The Haunting gets the
title of "summer- blockbuster-popcorn flick," but the film is fun enough and
keeps your attention for the full 2 hours it runs, and therefore I recommend
this creepy, fun film.
The Bottom Line- Although The Haunting may be this year's Armageddon, it is
still worth your time and money.

Author
Paul McElligott
Rule #1 in telling a good ghost story: the less you show of the ghost,
the better.  Robert Wise remembered that in 1963, Jan de Bont ignores it
in 1999.
To be honest, for the first half of this new adaptation of Shirley
Jackson's classic novel, the story follows the book and the original
movie with reasonable fidelity, and thus for the first hour, The
Haunting is reasonably effective and spooky.  The ghostly manifestations
are done with sound and suggestion, not ham-handed visuals.  After that,
however, the special effects take over and the film loses all narrative
cohesion.
There were a few early problems with the movie, too.  The first was the
house itself.  In the book and the first film, Hill House was a stately
mansion to be sure, but never resembled this cross between Xanadu and
the Winchester House.  Secondly, in the book and first movie version,
the character of Theodora (Catherine Zeta-Jones) was subtly suggested to
have a sexual interest in Eleanor.  In this version, Theo announces
outright that she has a girlfriend and a boyfriend and any sense of
subtle sexual tension between the two women is lost for good.
As far as the story goes, the writing depends on coincidences too
bizarre to be believed, and the resolution is too neat, too pat to make
an effective ghost story.  The foreshadowing in this script not only
lacks subtlety, but some events are so obviously telegraphed that Samuel
Morse should get a writing credit.
The acting is fine, although Liam Neeson chews the scenery a little
toward the end.  He's probably just making up for the lack of
opportunity he had to do any acting in Star Wars.
Jan de Bont serves up another reminder that he's never one to let story
get in the way of special effects.  This is probably his most competent
film since the original Speed, but that's hardly an accomplishment.
All in all, this version of The Haunting is a waste of the talents of
those involved.  See the 1963 original instead.  Better yet, read
Shirley Jackson's brilliant novel.  
This is film gets 4 out of 10 and most of those points were earned in
the first hour of the movie.

Author
Scott Renshaw
THE HAUNTING (1999)
(DreamWorks)
Starring:  Lili Taylor, Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Owen Wilson.
Screenplay:  David Self, based on the novel _The Haunting of Hill House_
by Shirley Jackson.
Producers:  Susan Arnold, Donna Roth and Colin Wilson.
Director:  Jan De Bont.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, profanity, violence)
Running Time:  110 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It's too bad there couldn't have been a bit more distance between the
release of THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT and the making of THE HAUNTING -- then,
at least, director Jan De Bont wouldn't have had an excuse.  With recent
history to consider, it may have made a perverse economic sense to turn
Shirley Jackson's supremely creepy story into a special effects-filled
funhouse.  Then along comes BLAIR WITCH to prove that you can still rattle
an audience with what might be happening rather than a computer-generated
representation of what is happening.  Ironically, BLAIR WITCH owes a debt
to the original 1963 version of THE HAUNTING in its study of the
psychology of fear.  Sadly, THE HAUNTING circa 1999 owes a debt to Jan
(TWISTER, SPEED 2) De Bont in its study of thick-headed filmmaking.
     An even more bitter irony is that this version of THE HAUNTING
gathers its characters for a study of the psychology of fear.  Researcher
Jeffrey Marrow (Liam Neeson) brings together three subjects for an
experiment, telling them only that it's a study of insomnia.  His actual
goal is to examine mounting fear and paranoia by placing his trio of
volunteers in the creepy Hill House, a mammoth manor with a dark history.
Nell (Lili Taylor), Theo (Catherine Zeta-Jones) and Luke (Owen Wilson) all
soon experience strange phenomena, but it is the emotionally fragile Nell
who experiences them most strongly.  She comes to believe that the spirits
of tormented children haunt Hill House, and that she must play a special
role in quieting those spirits.
     It's fairly clear from the start that the real star of THE HAUNTING
is the house itself.  De Bont sprinkles the film liberally with sweeping
helicopter shots of the sprawling exterior; he prowls through the bending
hallways and pans across cavernous great rooms; he lets cinematographer
Caleb Deschanel bathe the ornate bedrooms in muted oranges and reds.
Eugenio Zanetti's production design is certainly eye-catching, offering
more detail than one could possibly absorb in one sitting, but at a
certain point the sprawling staginess of the house starts to work against
the film.  It begins to feel like Disney's Haunted Mansion crossed with
the Winchester Mystery House, a tourist attraction designed more for 
spooky giggles than for genuine shivers.
     Once the house fails to deliver the creepiness, you're left with the
treatment of the material, which is literalist to the mundane extreme.
Robert Wise's 1963 THE HAUNTING was hardly perfect -- Julie Harris' 
hand-wringing fussiness took her Nell too far over the edge from the start
-- but it began from the principle that fear is about anticipation, not
revelation.  De Bont has no interest in any such subtleties.  Instead of
making a film about the way an environment of terror is more powerful in
imagination than in reality, he makes a film about faces appearing in
pillowcases, leaping skeletons, windows that turn into big staring
eyeballs, and living statues a la Ray Harryhausen.  Every bit of subtext
is either turned into in-your-face text (Claire Bloom's ambiguously
flirtatious Theo in the original becomes Catherine Zeta-Jones' "Hi, I'm a
bisexual" Theo) or abandoned (a key piece of Hill House back-story about
a tormented caretaker similar to Nell).  With its foundation-shaking
finale and monstrous apparitions, this isn't a remake of THE HAUNTING.
It's a remake of POLTERGEIST.
     Of course there's a place for the POLTERGEISTs of cinema.  Generally,
however, it helps if that sort of film can tap into something primal, like
scary clowns or menacing trees.  THE HAUNTING can't really be classified
as a horror film, because there's nothing remotely horrifying about it,
unless you count the inanely expository dialogue (e.g., a character
reacting to a stairway collapsing: "Look, the stairway is collapsing!").
In fact, it's often downright laughable -- sometimes intentionally (Owen
Wilson's goofball performance), sometimes not (a blissed-out otherworldly
ending that makes GHOST look restrained).  De Bont has made a film from
The School of Quips and Money Shots, all flash and chuckle.  He's merely
interested in showing off his big-budget toys so everyone can see the
thing that goes ooga-booga.  That's a pretty limp take on a tale of the
ooga-boogas inside our heads.

Author
Susan Granger
http://www.speakers-podium.com/susangranger.
Eugenio Zanetti is the star of this film, no question about
it. He's the production designer who created Hill House, a spectacular
Gothic mansion that delivers one helluva performance as an ominous
haunted house that captures the imaginations of its guests. Zanetti
makes rooms collapse, even fold into themselves, and there's a demonic
bed whose canopy descends with tentacles like an octopus. Paintings,
carvings, statues, even curtains come alive. And there's the slow,
ghostly breathing emanating from deep inside.  The question is: why
would Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones, and Lili Taylor want to play
second-fiddle to such an incredible creation that, in fact, makes them
seem wooden?  Looking terrified and screaming is really all that's
required in David Self's inane script, based on Shirley Jackson's
scare-classic, "The Haunting of Hill House." And the stylistic vision
of director Jan DeBont ("Speed," "Twister") truly revolves around the
special effects. As the story begins, Neeson, as a devious
psychologist, brings three insomniacs to Hill House, outside Boston,
for what he tells them is a sleep disorder study. In fact, he's
designed the experiment to observe the dynamics of fear, explaining:
"You don't tell the rats that they're actually in a maze."  But his
guests do know that, in the 1800s, a satanic textile manufacturer,
Hugh Crain, erected this stately "Taj Mahal" for his beloved wife and
their eight children, who are all buried nearby. What no one realizes
is that Hill House has become Crain's massive physical embodiment. On
the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, "The Haunting" is a spooky 4,
playing tricks with your mind as you munch your popcorn. If you're
curious, director Robert Wise made a far more subtle, restrained
version (1963), available on video.

Author
Brandon Herring
Rated PG-13 for some horror violence.
Starring: Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Lily Taylor.
This version of the classic 1963 movie of the same name is messed up. The
original was based on the terrifyingly creepy novel by Shirly Jackson entitled
'The Haunting of Hill House'. The 1963 version scared the wits out of me, even
at my age of 15. It takes your imagination on a ride, and does not show
anything. No ghosts, no monsters, no violence, nor no gore. It is a genuinely
scary movie, that stands as a classic to me. 
Now comes the 1999 version. Which supposedly had a 90 million dollar budget. I
can see why with the creepy set, scary effects etc. But what it doesn't have
that the first one did, is the terror. Don't get me wrong, this version has
it's moments, and I did jump many times. But the writers of this movie, totally
trashed it and messed it up. Especially the ending, I mean come what's going on
there? That never happened in the original movie.
Liam Neeson plays a doctor who is performing a study for people who cannot
sleep. He chooses three people: Eleanor a timid young woman (Lily Taylor),
Theodora a sexy woman (Catherine-Zeta Jones), and Luke (Owen Wilson). He
invites them to an old house by the name of Hill House. Which was built by old
Hugh Crane. He tells them it is a test, to see how they sleep at night. But as
they begin to see things aren't so easy.
First while Nell (Elanor) is sleeping, she hears bangs and thumps. She and Theo
(Theodora) feel cold, while their door is almost being broke down by something
mysterious. And the fact is, what we don't see is what scares us the most. Soon
Nell starts hearing child's voices, and learns the owner of Hill House Hugh
Crane, was once married, and took children from his mill to his house and
killed them. She hears their voices, 'Eleanor, Eleanor help us please, help
us'. 'Follw us Eleanor'. She realizes, the house is trying to tell her
something.
But the other people in the house do not believe her and thinks she is just
going crazy. But after a while, they realize the house is the problem. Not them
but the house. Now first of all allll the stuff happens to Nell. Which like the
original it happened. Then the others start to figure it out, and they see
stuff move and hear ghosts. Unlike the original, the first had no ghosts to
see, had no special effects, or nothing. It made you imagine what it was which
is the scariest thing. 
Now though I did like the special effects, after awhile I got tired of em. I
wanted to see some scary stuff, I wanted to be scared. Sadly I wasn't as scared
as the first made me. Especially the ending, which let me down completely. The
acting though not first-rate was good, especially from Catherine Zeta-Jones and
Lily Taylor. The set however, saved the film from being a total washout. It
seemed as though you were there, the set was alive, and it seemed real een
though it wasn't.
So bottom line: If you loved the original, and you want this to be just as
good, wait for video. Special effects are good, but overdone, acting ok, scares
are there but not adundant enough. Go see 'The Blair Witch Project' instead,
which is the best horror movie ever made. And I can't wait to see it again.
'The Haunting '99' isn't the worst horror movie made, though the climatic
scenes leaves the audience in a state of confusion, and wondering 'What the
hell just happened?'
Reviewed: August 2, 1999 by Brandon Herring.
Brandon Herring
Movie Review Heaven
(http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Author
John Carroll
The Haunting
Starring Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones and Lili Taylor
The Haunting, a film so confusing that it forgets the true meaning of
a horror film: to scare us.
   If you've ever seen a movie, which you probably have considering you are
on this website, you should know about all of the trivia they post before a
movie.  They have things like illustrations and you have to guess the movie or
facts about the film.  But, the one I always like are the "Other
Name" joke that try and rename a particular film.  For instance, the one
playing before The Haunting had different titles for the film, Small
Soldiers.  They had titles like Little Infantry and Can I Get
Those Fatigues in a Smaller Size?  Well, after seeing The Haunting,
I had a few particular names for it as well.  Unfortunately, I can only post
one of them, otherwise, I'd be getting some pretty angry e-mails from
overprotective mothers.  That title would be The Confusing.
   Ok, that is a pretty bad title, but it fits this film perfectly.  It
basically serves up no purpose, and combined with dry dialogue and a boring and
confusing plot, it completes the formula for a cinematic bomb.  Liam Neeson
once again gets wrapped up in a film without any depth, but at least The
Phantom Menace was exciting and had some depth.  The Haunting is
nothing but trash, but unfortunately, will still make a boatload of money. 
   Before I rant and rave about how bad this film is, let me point out the
few, and I stress the word few, bright spots in this film.  First, the house is
great- looking.  It looks beautiful, but this is also a dark spot.  It looks so
great that it is hard to be frightened by it.  This is something that rears its
ugly head at all points of the film.  Things look so great, that you are
looking on in awe instead of being scared straight.  Haunted house films have
to contain one element to even be slightly successful and that is being eerie. 
The Hill House is not eerie.  It is beautiful, but not the least bit
frightening.
   Ever heard of Lili Taylor?  Before this film I did not, but I am glad
that I do now.  She gives the only satisfactory performance in the film. 
Despite the dry dialogue and boring/confusing concept, she manages to light up
the screen every time she appears, but unfortunately, her co-stars are usually
following right behind.
   Owen Wilson, who plays Luke, is the only other cast member even close to
giving an admirable performance, other then Taylor.  He is basically there for
the comic relief, and his character development is poor in all other areas. 
All of the characters are desperately underdeveloped.  Wilson had potential as
Luke, but it seems they just needed him to add a few laughs.  
   Liam Neeson and Catherine Zeta-Jones suffer from the dialogue and plot
and should not have been in this film.  Their characters must suffer from
wicked mood swings because in each scene they turn from ruthless to
compassionate to scared to brave and whatnot.  They just are not believable and
this is the final nail in The Haunting's coffin.
   The plot is terrible.  The opening scene of the film is very important,
but the director makes it too obvious by getting close-ups of all the things
that will play a major role in the end of the film.  As I sat through the film,
I kept wondering what this film was trying to accomplish.  Nell, Lili Taylor's
character, goes from the hunted to the savior.  It makes no sense and the
director gives the audience no reasoning for the ridiculous changes that take
place in the film.  He forces the viewer to make various assumptions and does
not give any in-depth information.  For instance, the beginning of the film
gives us a sense of why Nell is getting involved in the program.  But, we get
zilch for the other four.  Plus, two of them get wiped out in the first ten
minutes.  And the worst part: most horror films have killings.  For some
reason, they kill off Luke at the end of the film.  No reason whatsoever, just
off with his head, literally.
   Overall, The Haunting is the epitome of a bad movie.  Bad plot,
confusing storyline and a waste of good talent.  Hopefully, Liam Neeson can
rebound and get into a good film and be used to his full potential.  Hopefully,
Lili Taylor will be recognized for doing such a great job in such a bad film. 
And hopefully, other horror films, such as The Blair Witch Project and
The Haunting of Hill House, will not be as bad as this one.
Rating: 1  Stars Out of 4 Stars
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Author
Brian Matherly
Cast: Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Owen Wilson, Lili Taylor, Bruce 
Dern, Virginia Madsen, Lisa Loeb
Written by: David Self
Directed by: Jan de Bont
Running Time: 112 minutes
Date Reviewed: August 4, 1999
Overblown remake of the 1963 Robert Wise film of the same name (based on 
Shirley Jackson's novel "The Haunting of Hill House") stars Lili Taylor as 
one of three "lab rats" that participate in a supposed "insomnia" study 
being initiated by Liam Neeson.  He is actually conducting a study on the 
causes of fear and why the human mind is still affected by it.  He drags the 
test subjects out to a foreboding mansion where all types of "creepy" CGI 
effects scare the cast and try the audience's patience.
I know this question has been posed before, but why do people keep remaking 
good movies?  The original was a great psychological horror film.  This new 
version is dull and very decidedly not scary.  In fact, I feel it is 
downright impossible to make a modern day PG-13 horror movie that is scary.  
Unless you find obvious computer generated special effects frightening, then 
there's nothing in this
film that will raise hackles.  I nearly fell asleep twice during the film, 
and probably would have if they guy two rows behind me didn't seem to have 
such a personal relationship with the characters that he felt he needed to 
discuss every decision they made with them as the film progressed.
It's sad to see such an amazing cast wasted so badly.  Owen Wilson spends 
most of the film wandering the halls of the house, and the script does no 
justice to his wonderful comic ability.  Catherine Zeta-Jones (always nice 
to look at) is given the woefully underwritten role of a bi-sexual insomniac 
that gets to run out of her bedroom perplexed every time some strange noise 
occurs.  Liam Neeson pops in from time to time to talk into his tape 
recorder and
attempt to convince the others that he has as much knowledge about what's 
going on as the rest of them do.  Finally, poor Lili Taylor, the center of 
the film, gets the brunt of the CGI effects thrown at her while everyone 
else gets to scream and try to rescue her.  Apparently, a subplot involving 
a tryst between Zeta-Jones and Taylor's characters was filmed but removed.  
That's too bad, because it might have lent some better characterization to 
the narrative.
This is Jan de Bont's second straight misfire (Speed 2:Cruise Control being 
the first).  When is he going to learn that bigger is not always necessarily 
better?  Robert Wise knew that when he made the original and the makes of 
The Blair Witch Project also knew that.  One should not approach a haunted 
house movie with a Twister mindset.
If de Bont and screenwriter David Self had let our minds fill in the blanks 
as to what was happening instead of showing us everything, it would have 
served to make the film terrifying.  What our mind fashions on it's own can 
be a thousand times more frightening than having having it completely led 
towards everything.  Apparently, yet another version of this story is being 
filmed under it's original title.  I certainly hope that this newer 
rendition will not be
hurt by the insanity of Jan de Bont's version and that it will retain the 
psychological impact that the original release had.  [PG-13]
Brian Matherly -- bmath2000@hotmail.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted 
without permission.


Author
Alex Ioshpe
DIRECTED BY: Jan de Bont
WRITTEN BY: David Shelf, based upon a novel by Shirley Jackson
CAST: Liam Neeson, Cathrine Zeta Jones, Lili Taylor, Lili Taylor, Marian Seldes
The tagline for this film is: "Some houses are just born bad". So I
didn't expect too much from this. But I had preserved a little spark
of ope as I entered the theatre. I thought: Liam Neeson, Cathrine Zeta
Jones and Jan De Bont. I thought, mabe it will be fun? And in fact the
beginning was rather intriguing. But by the end of it I thought: why
Liam Neeson and Cathrine Zeta Jones, Jan De Bont?. These great actors
are basically helpless with this muddled mess that defies any
rationality. Here is the story: In the monstrously over-decorated
mansion known as Hill House, visitors are tricked by an unknown doctor
(Liam Neeson) into being guinea pigs in a fright experiment under the
guise of an insomnia investigation. Among them is a sophisticated
bisexual (Cathrine Zeta Jones), a cynical dope (Owen Wilson) and a
gentle and emotional lady (Lily Taylor). Actually, the doctor is
researching the "primordial fear reaction" and intends to plant
disturbing ideas in his subjects and watch what happens. But he gets
unexpected help from the house itself.
It rumbles, hums and belches forth remarkable sights. Portals become
veiny stained-glass eyeballs. A fireplace guarded by stone lions gapes
like a sinister mouth. Filmy cherubic spirits take shape under sheets
and billowy curtains. But the computerized spooketeria rarely feels
real, placing an emotional wall between audience and screen. The
second half of the film is basically about the main heroine running
back and forth from the sinister lamps and evil furniture. Is that
exciting or what? The worst thing about it is that it didn't have to
be bad. It's based on a great book, ``The Haunting of Hill House,'' by
Shirley Jackson. A 1963 adaptation of the book was scary and
intelligent. It played with the greatest fears of our sub
conscience. "The Blair Witch Project", that cost less than an old car,
managed to shock and terrify the audiences from their senses. And with
a $70 mill. budget, De Bont and screenwriter David Self make hash out
of a perfectly lovely piece of terror. De Bont has a style of
filmmaking so out of line with the material that it is, in itself,
frightening. He is the master of the extravagant special effect and
the big visual adrenaline rush. But why give him a more serious
material? In the end "Haunting" will only haunt its fledgling studio
(Dream Works SKG) and De Bont's career as a director.
Yet it wouldn't be fair to say that everything is bad. The effects are
truly impressive and the house is wonderfully decorated -- beautiful,
mysterious, magical and spooky. But this is where the good things
end. The music is blaring, the floors moving, the ceiling morphing and
the pictures on the walls screaming -- and all of this, every second,
every moment of screen time, is absolutely without life. It's nothing
more than a special effects-extravaganza; visually impressive, but
intellectually hollow thriller that simply doesn't engage. At first
you do not know what's going on. Is this part of the experiment? Are
these hallucinations? Projections of the subconscience? Paranoia? But
in the end it shows out that this is actually happening. The house is
actually possessed. It is at that point when all your hopes for a good
entertainment disappears out of the window. For ever, I sat in
anticipation for a decent climax and that's what I got? I believe
Hichock once said that "it's better to wait for a climax, than to see
one". This may be true, and it might actually work, but there is only
one problem -- Jan De Bont is not Hichock and the things that he shows
are not scary, only stupid. They are impossible to take seriously. Any
paralells that you might have heard before, linking this picture to
Kubrick's "The Shining", are absolutely baseless. "Shining" had class,
style, story, acting, but most of all talent and
originality. "Haunting" has only special effects and art direction to
boast of. And those elements alone are not enough to make it a good
film. Casting good actors for small, pale parts only makes things
worse. But I guess that no matter what I or other critics say or
write, most of you will see this film anyway, even if the tagline
would say: "Some films are just born stupid".

Author
Jerry Saravia
While watching this remake of "The Haunting," I began to wonder how this film would fare if it was not a remake, but just another haunted house story. In other words, what if this was the first film adaptation of Shirley Jackson's 1959 novel, forgetting that the 1963 Robert Wise classic ever existed? 
Let's look at the particulars. Independent film queen Lili Taylor is Ellen, the morose, mousy woman invited to Hill House where a special study is being conducted by a doctor (Liam Neeson) on insomnia. The other guests, or subjects, are the blonde surfer dude Luke (Owen Wilson - who looks like a surfer dude even if he isn't one) and the sexual cat, Theo (Catherine Zeta-Jones), a bisexual who comforts Ellen and is thus teased by Luke. Oh, and did I notice the quick departure of Todd Fields as another subject? I suppose, I did. Maybe he was called in for some reshoots in Kubrick's "Eyes Wide Shut." 
I am sorry but this film hints at disaster from the get-go, and if this had been the first adaptation, it would have surely spelled doom for future fright fests. The fact is that "The Haunting" is directed by Jan De Bont, who helmed the exciting "Speed" and "Speed 2," the latter of which I have avoided. To be fair, the first hour of "The Haunting" captures a sense of spookiness and quiet calm that made the original so memorable. I mean, there are actually no special-effects! The characters are somewhat interesting if buffonish and detached. Zeta-Jones makes a sparkling entrance as she proclaims with a luscious, breathless voice upon entering Hill House: "Don't you just love it here? You don't get this from a Martha Stewart catalog." Neeson shows a little gleam, and shows interest in Taylor's Ellen who has her own demons to confront. Wilson has a few one-liners to offset the creepy dimensions of the inevitable haunting. Dare I say, this movie was starting to look like a classic!
!
 ghost story. But then...all hell is unleashed. 
De Bont unleashes one special-effects gimmick after another, never alluding to or insinuating the mysterious forces within the house. Instead, he shows us everything and anything. The final half-hour is especially laughable as the main demonic spirit crashes the house in a digital FX blowout of collapsing frames, cracked windows, contorted beds, split floorboards - it is all so outrageously banal that it makes the locust finale of "Exorcist II" look frightful by comparison. 
Since De Bont shows us only gaping actors staring at FX galore, we never feel as if this house is truly haunted - it feels like William Castle put on an expensive light show at Universal Studios. Sure, the art decoration and set design of the house is spectacular but hardly suggests that lurking shadows or ghosts inhabit it. And with scarce insight into any of the characters, "The Haunting" becomes an interminable void of faux fright cliches. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Author
Bill Chambers
THE HAUNTING * (out of four)
-a review by Bill Chambers (haunting@filmfreakcentral.net)
starring Lili Taylor, Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Owen Wilson
screenplay by David Self, based on The Haunting of Hill House by
Shirley Jackson
directed by Jan De Bont
"Some houses are born bad," goes The Haunting's tag line, to which I
must add, "Some movies, too." Nothing short of hiring a new cast, a
more literate screenwriter, and a new director could have saved this
tragically misguided adaptation of Jackson's meritorious novel. The
Haunting is late entry summer dreck too slick to be creepy, and its
seemingly endless stream of digital trickery and spooky ooky sound
effects don't frighten so much as numb the audience into
submission-the film is like a Rube Goldberg contraption rigged to
shout "boo."
Fragile Nell (Taylor), bisexual Theo (Zeta-Jones), and smiley Luke
(Wilson) are three insomniacs who gather at the reputedly possessed
Hill House for an extended study on sleep disorders, hosted by
Professor  Marrow (Neeson). Marrow's secretly gathering data on their
respective paranoid responses to his recount of Hill House's bleak
history. He's not prepared for the very real apparitions that
terrorize the crew, Nell especially, who has some ancestral connection
to the manor's previous inhabitants.
Taylor is thoroughly insufferable in her first big-budget lead. For
starters, her consistently dour expression sucks the life out of even
the early scenes, when we're introduced to the mansion and all its
fun-house trappings. Her character is supposed to be depressed, having
tended to an unloving mother for too many years, but Taylor plays Nell
as supernaturally lame, alternately grouchy, mopey, wiggy and
pathetic, and I kept wondering why the other characters didn't just
ditch this bitch.
As for the obscenely photogenic Zeta-Jones, she breezes through her
scenes with a wink and a smile and takes the scenery with her.
Unfortunately, she's saddled with some of the most unlikely dialogue
the screenplay has to offer. Theo's assessment of the house? "I love
it! Sort of Charles Foster Kane meets The Munsters." Who on Earth
would say that in place of "Citizen Kane meets The Munsters"?
(Furthermore, would you gladly spend a single night in a house
befitting that description?)
Both actresses fare better than Neeson, who looks embarrassed to be a
part of this ensemble (and for good reason), and his character is the
most bland. As Luke puts it, Dr. Marrow pulls the old "academic bait
and switch" on his subjects, but he breaks down and confesses to this
the second he's accused. Later, he risks his life by climbing a
crumbling stairwell to save Nell (it's amusing to hear Neeson shout
"Nell" repeatedly, given his starring role in the 1994 Jodie Foster
vehicle of the same name). Why was this nice, helpful, and redemptive
researcher so absent of ethics at the start?
The Haunting was well designed by Eugenio Zanetti. His sets are
obsessively detailed, and even before the CGI kicks in, they seem
alive, never quite still. I do have one beef with this aspect of the
production: the real life mansion used in exterior shots,
Nottinghamshire's Harlaxton Manor, is so vast that one has trouble
believing that Nell and company, no matter how much running away they
do from ghosts and goblins, always finish up in locations that were
established in act one, as if all the action has been confined to one
wing of Hill House.
Eighty million dollars was spent on The Haunting, and despite a
powerhouse box office debut, I doubt it will recoup its costs
(including marketing) domestically. Thank Jan De Bont for that:
proving for the third time that Speed was a fluke, in that it was
actually enjoyable, De Bont has served up another ride, sans thrill.
His images, well-lit though they are, have an unmistakable been
there-done that quality; in fact, whole sequences, not to mention the
cloaked, airy ghoul who owns the climax, feel lifted from a much
smarter and infinitely more enjoyable spectacle from three summers
back, Peter Jackson's The Frighteners. I don't mean to suggest De Bont
is a plagiarist, I mean to suggest that he's a hack, having found no
new ways to give us chills.

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
A big house. A big director, Jan de Bont of SPEED and TWISTER fame. A big
star, Catherine Zeta-Jones, hot of the heels of ENTRAPMENT (6.5/10) and
ZORRO. A big remake of THE HAUNTING. And big special effects. So what do
they all amount to? Unfortunately for us, a big bore!
PLOT:
A hotshot doctor brings three insomniacs to an old, spooky mansion for
controlled testing. Unbeknownst to the patients, the good doctor is actually
conducting his own cover project that has to do with the psychology of fear.
CRITIQUE:
This movie just didn't scare me one bit. Sure, it creeped and spooked me out
a little here and there, but on the whole, it took waaaaay too long to get
going, provided very little meat in the plot, went way past its own bedtime,
and basically relied on grunts, the muttering of children's voices and
over-the-top special effects, to scare us. Well, this film didn't do much
for me. And they might as well have called it the "Haunting of Lily Taylor",
since she's basically the only character who had any real depth, background
or reason to be in the house in the first place.
Don't get me wrong, Catherine Zeta was sweet window dressing (despite my
continued perception of her faint mustache-see ENTRAPMENT), and Owen Wilson
was good as the standard "comic relief", but come on people, if you're going
to have us sit through two hours in a theater with these folks, how 'bout
giving them a little more than one-liners as dimension. Neeson was also
wasted as the smart, British guy. It's all too sad, cause certainly the
"idea" seemed like a good one (see THE SHINING (9/10) for a close to perfect
example of a creepy gone awry), but the story was thin, the conclusion was
laughable (Be gone...poof!) and the special effects? Well, they sure were
nice to look at, but not for a moment did one of them scare, or even for a
split-second, have me believe that they were anything more than Hollywood
special gadgetry.
See it for Zeta-Jones, or if you like special effects and scary movies that
take forever to get going, and provide very little payback, otherwise skip
it and check out the original or the ultimate movie about spooky homes from
the netherworld, THE SHINING.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Goofy actor Owen Wilson co-scripted indie favorites RUSHMORE (8/10) and
BOTTLE ROCKET with director Wes Anderson. His brother Luke Wilson is also an
actor, who once dated Drew Barrymore for a year or so. Brother Andrew is
also an actor.
Singer Lisa Loeb is listed in the credits as having portrayed the character
of Olivia Morice, but I personally did not notice her. She is well known for
her number one single "Stay (I missed you)" and goofy glasses.
The creaks and moans heard throughout the house were prerecorded and played
during filming in order to get a more natural expression of fear out of the
actors.
Catherine Zeta-Jones is currently dating flabby ass actor Michael "Sex is my
life" Douglas. She stands 5'8".
In 1998, actor Michael Rapaport pleaded guilty to the aggravated harassment
of Lily Taylor. He was ordered to stay away from her and undergo counseling
for one year.
Actor Bruce Dern, who plays the throwaway role of the gatekeeper in this
film, was once nominated for an Oscar for Best Supporting Actor for his role
in COMING HOME.
Director Jan de Bont was born in Holland, and began his lengthy career as a
cinematographer on films as DIE HARD, HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER and BASIC
INSTINCT, directed by another Dutchman, Paul Verhoeven.
Actor Todd Field also played a small but pivotal role in Stanley Kubrick's
last film, EYES WIDE SHUT. He was Nick Nightingale, the pianist.
This film was originally titled THE HAUNTING OF HILL HOUSE.
